 Banking, Finance, & The Money System.  
© Copyright. Brian McDermott

It's time the people of Queensland and Australia knew the alarming facts about Banking, Finance, and the Money System. Test your own knowledge of these facts by the following questions: 

Do you know that no bank lends money deposited with it? 
Do you know that when a bank lends money it CREATES IT OUT OF NOTHING - THIN AIR! 
Do you know that bank loans are merely pen and ink entries in the credit columns of a bank's ledger? And these days, are simply pixels in a computer? THEY HAVE NO OTHER EXISTENCE!
Do you know that practically all the money in the community – and the country - comes into circulation as a debt to the banks? 
Do you know that money loaned by a Government bank is just as much a debt to the people as if it were loaned from a private bank? 
Do you know that “fixed deposits” are a plausible screen to hide the creation of credit? 
Did it ever occur to you that the banks enjoy this unique facility of creating credit and putting the nation progressively into debt-bondage because they create FINANCIAL credit against the REAL credit created by the people? 
Do you realize that every time a Government borrows money for a public work, the people are debited with the liability (in perpetuity), but are NEVER credited with the value of the asset? 
Do you know that every repayment of a bank loan cancels the amount of the loan out of existence? 
Do you know that Treasury Notes are Government I.O.U.'s — national pawn tickets for pledging the assets of the country to the private banks for the loan of OUR OWN financial credit? 
Do you know that banks purchase bank sites, build premises, and acquire assets at no real cost whatever to themselves — by the simple process of honoring their own cheques?

Do you realize that not one politician in a thousand, in Queensland, or Australia, or anywhere for that matter, understands this? It is not taught in universities, or anywhere. It is a well-kept secret, and has been for hundreds of years. 

Sound incredible? Then read and study the rest of this article.
 END OF PART 1

PART 2.
 The respective Australian governments, both state and federal, (not the people) have run up public debts over the years to near breaking point, and debiting those debts to us, the people, BUT WE, THE PEOPLE HAVE NEVER EVER BEEN CREDITED WITH THE ASSETS, THEREBY DEFRAUDING THE AUSTRALIAN PEOPLE OF OUR BIRTHRIGHT, AND DISPOSSESSING US OF OUR LEGITIMATE ASSETS, I.E., THE COMMON  WEALTH OF THE LAND KNOWN AS THE COMMONWEALTH OF AUSTRALIA. 

"Although most writers still confuse and underestimate the matter,  banks certainly create credit, or more exactly, they create money."

(Quote from his book Oil In Troubled Waters, page 54)
Dr. Jim Cairns, one time Federal Treasurer.

The policies of every federal government, irrespective of which party is in power, and most state governments over the last fifty (50) years have been nothing more or less than thinly veiled, incrementally introduced, warmed-up Marxism, under the appearance of, and masquerading as a constitutional monarchy. 

“The Bank hath benefit of interest on all monies, which it creates out of nothing.”   The boastful statement of the co-founder (and the Financiers’ ‘Front Man’) of the (privately owned) Bank of England, William Patterson, upon its foundation in 1694. 


“He who takes up usury for a loan of money acts unjustly, for he sells what does not exist. It is wrong in itself to take a price (usury) for the use of money lent. And as in the case of other offences against justice, one is bound to make restitution of his unjustly acquired money.”  Statement of St. Thomas Aquinas.

“We must go forward, cautiously, and consolidate each acquired position, because already, the inferior social stratum of society (the common people, Ed.,) is giving unceasing signs of agitation.
“Let us make use of the courts . . . 
“When, through the law’s intervention, the common people shall have lost their homes, they will be more easy to control and more easy to govern, and they shall not be able to resist the strong hand of the Government acting in accordance with . . .the control of the leaders of finance. 
“We must keep the people busy with political antagonisms.
“We’ll therefore speed up the question of reform  (of tarrifs within) the Democratic Party; and we’ll put the spotlight on the question of protection …(for) the Republican Party.
“By dividing the electorate this way, we’ll be able to have them spend their energies at struggling amongst themselves, on questions that, for us, have no importance whatsoever.”
United State Bankers magazine, 1892.
As quoted in the Michael Journal, Jan-Feb., 2003 

“The most hated sort of money-making and with the greatest reason, is usury, which makes a gain out of money itself, and not from the natural use of it – for money was intended merely for exchange, not for increase at interest. And this term interest, which implies the birth of money from money, is applied to the breeding of money, because the off-spring resembles the parent. Whereof of all modes of money-making, this is the most unnatural.” 
Statement of Aristotle on Usury, 350 BC.  

“The function of money is not to make money, but to move goods.  Money is only one part of our transportation system. It moves goods from man to man. A dollar bill is like a postage stamp, it is no good unless it will move commodities between persons. If a postage stamp will not carry a letter or will not move goods, it is just the same as an engine that will not run. Someone will have to get out and fix it.” Statement of Henry Ford. 

“The modern banking system manufactures money out of nothing. The process is perhaps the most astounding piece of sleight of hand that was ever invented. Banking was conceived in iniquity and born in sin…..bankers own the earth. Take it away from them, but leave them the power to create money, and with a flick of the pen, they will create enough money to buy it back again…….take this great power away from them and all the great fortunes like mine will disappear, and they ought to disappear, for then this would be a better world to live in …… but if you want to continue to be slaves of the bankers and pay the cost of your own slavery, then let bankers continue to create money and control credit.” 
The writings of Sir Josiah Stamp, President of the Bank of England, at the University of Texas, 1920. 

“Of all the discoveries and inventions by which we live and die, this totally improbable helix of credit is the most cunning, the most liable, the least comprehended, and, next to high explosives, the most dangerous. All that bankers themselves know about it is how it works from day to day. Beyond that, it is a bit from Pandora.”    Statement by Garet Garret, author of “The Bubble that Broke the World”, and regarded as “the clearest expositor of economics in the United States”: 


“When banks grant credit by creating or adding to deposits subject to check . . new dollars are created. They are credit dollars and they are created by the stroke of a pen rather than by dies and the stamping machines, but their purchasing power is not less than that of the dollars coined at the government mint . . . the principal way in which dollars are created in modern economic society is by borrowing.”  Statement of Sumner H. Slichter, Professor of Business Economics at Harvard: 

“We have already learned that the most important kind of money is credit. The most important kind of credit is credit created out of thin air by the banking system. Eighty per cent of the volume of business in Canada uses money that isn’t there. Banks lend it out of nowhere to people, and when it is paid back, it returns to nowhere. It can’t be seen, yet it can make the difference between full employment and mass unemployment. MOST OF THE REVENUE OF BANKS IS INTEREST ON MONEY THAT DOES NOT EXIST.” Statement of W. Trimble of Ryerson Institute, Toronto, writing in “Understanding the Canadian Economy”:
END OF PART 2.

PART 3

“The money power preys upon the nation in times of peace, and conspires against it in times of adversity. It is more despotic than monarchy, more insolent than autocracy, more selfish than bureaucracy. It denounces, as public enemies, all who question its methods, or throw light upon its crimes.”  Statement of William Jennings Bryan: 

“I am afraid that the ordinary citizen will not like to be told that banks can and do create and destroy money. The amount of money in existence varies only with the action of the banks in increasing or decreasing deposits and bank purchases. We know how this is effected. Every loan, overdraft or bank purchase creates a deposit, and every repayment of a loan, overdraft or bank sale destroys a deposit. And they who control the credit of a nation direct the policy of governments, and hold in the hollow of their hands the destiny of the people.”  Statement of the Rt. Hon Reginald McKenna, former Chancellor of the Exchequer, and Chairman of the Midland Bank, addressing a meeting of the shareholders of the bank on January 25, 1924 (recorded in his book, “post-War Banking”): 

“A credit in the Bank of England’s books is regarded by the financial community as ‘cash’, and this pleasant fiction has given the bank the power of creating cash by the stroke of a pen, and to any extent it pleases, subject only to its own view as to what is prudent and sound business.  Statement of Hartley Withers in his book, “International Finance”: 

“ . . .  Today in Australia, as in most other modern economies, all money is a debt of the banking system.”   statement by the Bank of N.S.W. in its Special Article ‘Sources of Money’ in the ‘Bank of New South Wales Review’, October 1978: 

It has been clearly established, in Australia and other countries, that the banking system creates credit. In 1937 an Australian Royal Commission investigated Finance and Banking. In his summing up, the Chairman, Sir Mellis Napier, of the Royal Commission stated, 

"That the Commonwealth Bank (now the Reserve Bank of Australia) can make money available to Governments or to others on such terms as it chooses even by way of a loan without interest or even without requiring either interest or repayment of principal."

“We are not yet ready for such a crisis. Capital must protect itself in every possible manner through combination and legislation. The courts must be called to our aid. Debts must be collected, bonds and mortgages foreclosed as rapidly as possible. Where, through a process of law, the common people have lost their homes, they will be more tractable and easily governed through the influence of the strong arm of government, applied by central power of imperial wealth, under the control of leading financiers. The truth is well known among our principal men now engaged in forming an imperialism of capital to govern the World. While they are doing this, the people must be kept in a condition of political antagonism. … By thus dividing the voters we can get them to expend their energies in fighting over questions of no importance to us”.
From the United States Bankers’ Magazine of 1892

The war-time Labor leader, John Curtin advocated the use of national credit. 
In a speech in the Sydney Town Hall at the outbreak of war, Curtin said, 
"...Everything must be paid for, not by reducing wage standards, but by the use of the National Credit. Because the Labor Government was in Federal Parliament, there is a Commonwealth Bank. It was created as a means of releasing National Credit. But because Labor lost office the National Bank (Commonwealth) has been transformed by our opponents into a mere puppet of the private banks... The costs of war can be met without piling up huge debts, and without interest payments sucking our national life-blood..."

The British historian, Sir Arthur Bryant had a clear understanding of the use of new credits. 
In "The Illustrated London News", March 1983, Bryant wrote: "To exercise the right inherent in every sovereign state of creating and issuing a sufficiency of money to make financially possible what is physically possible and morally desirable, would enable as much real wealth  to be brought into existence as, with its immense inventive and scientific potentialities, the nation is capable of making. It would give Government a freedom of action which its present dependence on borrowed money denies it..."

“I sincerely believe that banking institutions are more dangerous than standing armies. Already they have raised up a moneyed aristocracy that has set the government at defiance. The issuing power should be taken from the banks and restored to the people, to whom it properly belongs.”  Thomas Jefferson: 

“If the American people ever allow private banks to control the issue of their currency, . . . . . the banks and the corporations which grow up around them will deprive the people of all property, until their children wake up homeless on the continent their fathers conquered.” A further statement by Thomas Jefferson:  

“I have two great enemies; the southern army in front of me, and the financial powers behind me. Of the two, the enemy to my rear is the greater foe.” The famous statement of President Abraham Lincoln during the Civil War:  

 “The government should create, issue, and circulate all the currency and credit needed to satisfy the spending power of the government and the buying power of the consumers. The privilege of creating and issuing money is not only the supreme prerogative of the government, but it is the government’s greatest creative opportunity.  

“The financing of all public enterprise, and the conduct of the treasury will become matters of practical administration. Money will cease to be master, and will become servant of humanity.”  The writings of Abraham Lincoln, shortly before he was assassinated: 

“It is advisable to do all in your power to sustain such prominent daily and weekly newspapers, especially the Agricultural and Religious Press, as will oppose the greenback issue of paper money and that you will also withhold patronage from all applicants who are not willing to oppose the government issue of money. To repeal the Act creating bank notes or to restore to circulation the government issue of money will be to provide the people with money and will therefore seriously affect our individual profits as Bankers and lenders. See your congressman at once and engage him to support our interest that we may control legislation." 
James Buel
Secretary of the American Bankers Association, 1877

“We have stricken the shackles from 4,000,000 human beings and brought all labourers to a common level, but not so much by the elevation of former slaves as by reducing the whole working population, white and black, to a condition of serfdom. While boasting of our noble deeds, we are careful to conceal the ugly fact that by our iniquitous money system, we have manipulated a system of oppression which, though more refined, is no less cruel than the old system of chattel slavery . . . . . . . . the concentration of capital and the growth of their turnover is radically challenging the significance of the banks. Scattered capitalists are transformed into a single collective capitalist. When carrying the current account of a few capitalists, the banks, as it were, transact a purely technical and exclusively auxiliary operation. When, however, these operations grow to enormous dimensions, we find that a handful of monopolists control all the operations, both commercial and industrial, of capitalist society. They can, by means of their banking connections . . . first ascertain exactly the position of the various capitalists, then control them, influence them by restricting or enlarging, facilitating or hindering their credits, and finally they can entirely determine their fate.” Vladimir Ulyanov (Lenin):

“There is no better way to destroy the capitalist system than to debauch the currency.”  A further statement of Lenin:

"The process by which banks create money is so simple that the mind is repelled." Professor J. K. Galbraith 

“I care not what (QEII?) puppet is placed on the throne of England to rule the (Commonwealth) Empire. The man who controls Britain’s money supply controls the British Empire, and I control the British money supply.” Nathan Mayer Rothschild (1776-1836)

“I set to work to read the Act of Parliament by which the Bank of England was created, and all the Acts about loans, and funds, and dividends, and payings, and sinking funds and I soon began to perceive that the fate of the Kingdom must finally turn upon what should be done with that accursed thing called the National Debt. The sum at first borrowed was a mere trifle. The inventors knew well what they were about. Their design was to mortgage by degrees the whole of the country... to those who would lend money to the State... the deep scheme has from its ominous birth been breeding usurers of every description, feeding and fattening on the vitals of the country, till it has produced what the World never saw before - starvation in the midst of abundance!”

William Cobbett
MP in the reformed Parliament of 1832 and author of “Rural Rides”

“Give me the control of the credit of a nation, and I care not who makes the laws.”  The famous boastful statement of Nathaniel Meyer Rothschild, speaking to a group of international bankers, 1912:

“The few who could understand the (banking) system will either be so interested in its profits, or so dependent on its favours, that there will be no opposition from that class, while on the other hand, the great body of people, mentally incapable of comprehending the tremendous advantage that capital derives from the system, will bear its burdens without complaint, and perhaps without even suspecting that the system is inimical to their interests.”  The gloating statement by Rothschild Bros. of London, in a letter to New York bankers, 1863.

“When a bank lends, it creates money out of nothing.”   Statement of R.G. Hawtrey, former Assistant Under-Secretary to the British Treasury; in his book, “Trade Depression and the Way out”: 

“Banks create credit. It is a mistake to suppose that bank credit is created to any important extent by the payment of money into the banks. The bank’s debit is a means of payment, it is credit money. It is a clear addition to the amount of the means of payment in the community.”  Statement in Encyclopedia Brittanica, 14th Edition, under the Heading of Banking and Credit (Vol. 3, Page 48):

“If a nation can issue a dollar bond, it can issue a dollar bill. The elements that make the bond good makes the bill good also. The difference between the bond and the bill is that the bond lets the money broker collect twice the amount of the bond and an additional 20%. Whereas the currency, the honest sort provided by the constitution, pays nobody but those who contribute in some useful way. It is absurd to say that our Country can issue bonds and cannot issue currency. Both are promises to pay, but one fattens the usurer, while the other helps the People.”    Statement by Thomas Edison: 

“Whoever controls the volume of money in any country is absolute master of all industry and commerce. And when you realize that the entire system is very easily controlled, one way or another, by a few powerful men at the top, you will not have to be told how periods of inflation and depression originate.”  Statement by USA President James A. Garfield: 

“The hand that gives is above the hand that takes. Money has no motherland; financiers are without patriotism and without decency; their sole object is gain.”  Statement of Napoleon Bonaparte: 

 The modern banking system manufactures money out of nothing. The process is perhaps the most astounding piece of sleight of hand that was ever invented. Banks can inflate, mint and un-mint the modern ledger-entry currency.” Statement by Major L. L. B. Angu 

“The banks can create and destroy money. Bank credit is money. It’s the money we do most of our business with, not with that currency which we usually think of as money.”   Governor Eccles, former head of the Federal Reserve Bank Board of the United States, made in evidence before a Congressional Committee: 

"Although most writers still confuse and underestimate the matter, banks certainly create credit or, more exactly, they create money. Creation of money by the banks is a simple process." Dr. Jim Cairns in his book, Oil in Troubled Waters.

“There can be no doubt that all deposits are created by the banks.”  Statement of Lord Keynes, economist and former board member of the Bank of England: 

“The percentage of cash to credit necessary for a bank to hold, demonstrated over a period of years, is 2 ½%, with 7 ½% as a reserve with other banks.”  Statement by Professor H. Kniffer, in his “American Banking Practice”: 

“Banking is little more than book-keeping. It is a transfer of credit from one person to another. The transfer is by cheque. Cheques are currency (not legal tender). Currency is money.”   Statement of Sir Edward Holden, an eminent British banker: 

“In other words, every Reserve Bank in the Federal Reserve System purporting to issue these "Federal Reserve Notes" as money to its member Banks and every member Bank issuing them to its customers is legally insolvent, because they cannot ever redeem such a "Federal Reserve Note" in lawful money of these United States of America. Further, they are also wilfully committing Fraud upon their customers, because they know (even if their customers do not know) that they cannot redeem those "Federal Reserve Notes".

U.S. Congressional Report on Money (1964)



 BE MINDFUL of the fact that the above situation has in fact been accomplished, due to a consistent, progressive and continuous programme of deceit, subterfuge, cunning and make-believe on the part of the banks, and by successive, subservient fabian socialist/masonic “governments”, both state and federal, in violation of their oaths of office, and to the gradual detriment and destruction of the assets of the people of Australia.

“If the American people knew and understood the banking and financial system as I do, then I believe there would be a revolution before morning,”  Warning by Mr. Henry Ford 

“It was not accidental. It was a carefully contrived occurrence . .  The international bankers sought to bring about a condition of despair here, so that they might emerge as rulers of us all.”  Statement by Rep. Louis T. McFadden, Chairman of the House Banking and Currency Committee, regarding the 1929 Wall Street crash: 

“After World War 1, Germany fell into the hands of German international bankers. Those bankers bought her, and now they own her, lock, stock, and barrel. They have purchased her industries, they have mortgages on her soil, they control her production, they control all her public utilities. The international German bankers have subsidised the present government of Germany, and they have also supplied every dollar of the money Adolph Hitler has used in his lavish campaign to build up a threat to the government of Bruening. When Bruening fails to obey the orders of German international bankers, Hitler is brought forth to scare the Germans into submission . . .Through the Federal Reserve Board . . .  over $30 Billions of American money has been paid into Germany . . . You have all heard of the spending that has taken place in Germany. . . modernistic dwellings, her great planetariums, her gymnasiums, her swimming pools, her fine public highways, her perfect factories. All this was done on our money. All this was given to Germany through the Federal Reserve Board. The Federal Reserve has pumped so many billions of dollars into Germany, that they dare not name the total.” Further warning Louis T. McFadden, eight years before Hitler invaded Poland, re the rise to power of Adolph Hitler: 

“Practices of the unscrupulous money changers stand indicted in the court of public opinion, rejected by the hearts and minds of men . . . The money changers have fled from their high seats in the temple of our civilization.” Statement by President of Franklin D. Roosevelt, March 4th, 1933 (before he did a back-flip and became their subservient tool): 

“The powers of financial capitalism has (a) far reaching (plan), nothing less than to create a world system of financial control in private hands, able to dominate the political system of each country, and the economy of the world as a whole.   
  This system was to be controlled in a feudalist fashion by the central banks of the world acting in concert, by secret agreements arrived at in frequent meetings and conferences.

“The apex of the system was to be the Bank for International Settlements, in Basle, Switzerland, a private bank owned and controlled by the world’s central banks, which were themselves private corporations. 

 “Each central bank . . . sought to dominate its government by its ability to control Treasury loans, to manipulate foreign exchanges, to influence the level of economic activity in the country, and to influence co-operative politicians by subsequent rewards in the business world.”   Statement of Professor Carroll Quigley, Georgetown University, former "insider," and author of the book, “Tragedy and Hope”: 

"Communism is fascism with a human face." 
- Susan Sontag  

“The Federal Reserve definitely caused the Great Depression by contracting the amount of currency in circulation by one third from 1929 to 1933.” Statement by Milton Freedman, Nobel Prize winning economist, in 1996: 

“The issue which has swept down the centuries and which will have to be fought sooner or later, is the people versus the banks.”  Statement by Lord Acton: 

“This is a staggering thought. We are completely dependent on the commercial banks. Someone has to borrow every dollar we have in circulation, cash or credit. If the banks create ample synthetic money, we are prosperous; if not, we starve. We are absolutely without a permanent money system. When one gets a complete grasp of the picture, the tragic absurdity of our hopeless position is almost incredible, but there it is. It is the most important subject intelligent persons can investigate and reflect upon. It is so important that our present civilization may collapse unless it becomes widely understood, and the defects remedied very soon.”   Warning by Robert H. Hemphill (former Credit Manager of the Federal Reserve Bank, Atlanta Ga.): 


"This (Federal Reserve) Act  establishes the most gigantic trust [monopoly] on earth. When the President  (Woodrow Wilson) signs this bill, the invisible government by the Monetary  Power will be legalized. The people may not know it immediately, but the day  of reckoning is only a few years removed. The trusts will soon realize that  they have gone too far even for their own good. The people must make a  declaration of independence to relieve themselves from the Monetary Power.  This they will be able to do by taking control of Congress. Wall Streeters  could not cheat us if you Senators and Representatives did not make a humbug  of Congress...The greatest crime of Congress is its currency system. The worst  legislative crime of the ages is perpetrated by this banking bill. The caucus  and the party bosses have again operated and prevented the people from getting  the benefit of their own government." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindbergh,  Sr., 1913

“History records that the money-changers have used every form of abuse, intrigue, deceit and violent means possible to maintain their control over governments by controlling money and its issuance.” Warning by U.S. President James Maddison, shortly before he was assassinated: 

“The Federal Reserve is one of the most corrupt institutions the world has ever seen. There is not a man within the sound of my voice who does not know that this Nation is run by the International Banks.”  Warning by Congressman Louis T. McFadden: 

“Most Americans and Australians, and for that matter, most people of the world have no real understandings of the operation of the international money lenders.  The accounts of the Federal Reserve System have never been audited. It operates outside the control of Congress, and manipulates the credit of the United States, and for that matter, the credit of the entire world.”  Warning by Senator Barry Goldwater:

Be mindful of the fact that all money which comes into existence, does so as debt to the banking system, and that the banks do not create the interest, so that there is never enough money in existence, anywhere in the world, to repay both the debt and the interest, resulting in a situation where there is a deliberate, world-wide, artificial scarcity of money, and therefore an ever-increasing debt to that banking system. 

Be mindful of the fact that such a debt-based money system (where the capital is created out of thin air by the banks, at the stroke of a pen, and then loaned out by the banks, to the borrowers, whereby the borrowers are expected to pay back the capital, plus interest, which interest does not exist in the first place) is not only mathematically an inherently flawed, impossible system, but deliberately fraudulent. 

 Be mindful of the fact that where money speaks, there all law is silent.

 “Because of this power (of credit creation), the Commonwealth Bank (now the Reserve Bank of Australia) is able to increase the cash of the trading banks in the ways we have pointed out above.

“Because of this power too, the Commonwealth Bank can increase the cash reserves of the trading banks; for example, it can buy securities and other property, it can lend to the government or to others in a variety of ways, and it can even make money available to the Governments and to others free of any charge.”  

Asked to interpret this last clause, Mr. Justice Napier, Chairman of the Commission, replied, through the Secretary of the Commission, Mr. Harris, as follows: 

 “This statement means that the Commonwealth Bank can make money available to Governments or to others on such terms as it chooses, even by way of a loan without interest, OR EVEN WITHOUT REQUIRING EITHER INTEREST OR REPAYMENT OF PRINCIPAL.” 
   Report of the Australian Royal Commission into the Monetary and Banking system of Australia in (1937), Section 504, “Creation of Credit”:

"While economic textbooks claim that people and corporations are  competing for markets and resources, I claim that in reality they are  competing for money - using markets and resources to do so. Greed and fear of  scarcity are being continuously created and amplified as a direct result of  the kind of money we are using. For example, we can produce more than enough  food to feed everybody, and there is definitely not enough work for everybody  in the world, but there is clearly not enough money to pay for it all. In  fact, the job of central banks is to create and maintain that currency  scarcity. Money is created when banks lend it into existence When a bank  provides you with a $100,000 mortgage, it creates only the principal, which  you spend and which then circulates in the economy. The bank expects you to  pay back $200,000 over the next 20 years, but it doesn't create the second  $100,000 - the interest. Instead, the bank sends you out into the tough world to battle against everybody else to bring back the second $100,000." 
-  Bernard Lietaer, Former Central Banker 

"In addition to almost unlimited usury, the bankers have another method of drawing vast amounts of wealth. The banks are able to approve or disapprove large loans to large and successful corporations to the extent that refusal of a loan will bring about  a reduction in the selling price of the corporation's stock. After depressing the price, the bankers' agents buy large blocks of the company's stock. Then, if the bank suddenly approves a multi-million dollar loan to the company, the stock rises and is then sold for a profit. In this manner, billions of dollars are made with which to buy more stock. This practice is so refined today that the Federal Reserve Board need only announce to the newspapers an increase or  decrease in their "discount rate" to send stocks soaring or crashing at their  whim. Banks collect billions in interest by loaning to Government and the Corporations." 
- Pastor Sheldon Emry
"When a government is dependent upon bankers for money, they and not the leaders of the government control the situation, since the hand that gives is above the hand that takes...Money has no motherland; financiers are without patriotism and without decency; their sole object is gain." 
- Napoleon Bonaparte, 1815  

"Capital must protect itself in every way...Debts must be collected and loans and mortgages foreclosed as soon as possible. When through a processof law the common people have lost their homes, they will be more tractable and more easily governed by the strong arm of the law applied by the central power of leading financiers. People without homes will not quarrel with their leaders. This is well known among our principal men now engaged in forming an imperialism of capitalism to govern the world. By dividing the people, we can get them to expend their energies in fighting over questions of no importance to us except as teachers of the common herd."  - Taken from the Civil Servants' Year Book, "The Organizer", January 1934
"As the inflation proceeds and the real value of the currency fluctuates wildly from month to month, all permanent relations between debtors and creditors, which form the ultimate foundation of capitalism, become so utterly disordered as to be almost meaningless; and the process of wealth-getting degenerates into a gamble and a lottery.”

Lenin was certainly right. There is no subtler, no surer means of overturning the existing basis of society than to debauch the currency. The process engages all the hidden forces of economic law on the side of destruction, and does it in a manner which not one man in a million is able to diagnose." 
 John Maynard Keynes

Capitalism is organized crime. It is by design that the rich get richer and the poor get poorer, not by accident. 

"Government is not reason; it is not eloquence; it is force! Like fire, it is a dangerous servant and a fearful master." 
- George Washington 

"I am convinced that those societies (such as the Native American peoples) which live without government enjoy in their general mass an infinitely greater degree of happiness than those who live under the European governments. Among the former, public opinion is in the place of law, & restrains morals as powerfully as laws ever did anywhere. Among the latter, under pretence of governing they have divided their nations into two classes, wolves & sheep. I do not exaggerate." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"The modern theory of the perpetuation of debt has drenched the earth with blood, and crushed its inhabitants under burdens ever accumulating." 
- Thomas Jefferson  

"I hope we shall crush in its birth the aristocracy of our moneyed corporations, which dare already to challenge our government to a trial of strength and bid defiance to the laws of our country." 
- Thomas Jefferson  

"If the American people ever allow private banks to control the issue of their money, first by inflation and then by deflation, the banks and corporations that will grow up around them (around the banks), will deprive the people of their property until their children will wake up homeless on the continent their fathers conquered."
        Thomas Jefferson (1743-1826), US Founding Father
"I believe that banking institutions are more dangerous to our liberties than standing armies. Already they have raised up a moneyed aristocracy that has set the government at defiance. The issuing power (of money) should be taken away from the banks and restored to the people to whom it properly belongs." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"The system of banking we have both equally and ever reprobated. I contemplate it as a blot left in all our constitutions, which, if not covered, will end in their destruction. I sincerely believe, with you...that the principle of spending money to be paid by posterity, under the name of funding, is but swindling futurity on a large scale." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"To take a single step beyond the boundaries thus specially drawn around the powers of Congress is to take possession of a boundless field of power, no longer susceptible of any definition. The incorporation of a bank, and the powers assumed by this bill  [chartering the first Bank of the United States] have not, in my opinion, been  delegated to the United States by the Constitution. They are not among the powers specially enumerated." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"I wish it were possible to obtain a single amendment to our Constitution - taking from the Federal government their power of borrowing (from privately-owned corporate banks)." 
- Thomas Jefferson, 1798 

"We are undone, my dear sir, if legislation is still permitted which makes our money, much or little, real or imaginary, as the moneyed interests shall choose to make it." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"All the perplexities, confusions, and distresses in America arise, not from defects in the Constitution or confederation, not from want of honor or virtue, as much as from downright ignorance of the nature of coin, credit, and circulation." 
- John Adams 

"Liberty cannot be preserved without a general knowledge among the people, who have a right...and  a desire to know; but besides this, they have a right, an indisputable,  unalienable, indefeasible, divine right to that most dreaded and envied kind  of knowledge, I mean of the characters and conduct of their rulers." 
-  John Adams 
"We, the People, are the rightful masters of both the Congress and the Courts. Not to overthrow the Constitution, but to overthrow the men who have perverted it." 
- Abraham Lincoln 

"I have two great enemies, the southern army in front of me and the financial institutions in the rear. Of the two, the one in the rear is the greatest enemy. The money power preys upon the nation in times of peace, and conspires against it in times of adversity. It is more despotic than monarchy, more insolent than autocracy, more selfish than bureaucracy. It denounces, as public enemies, all who question its methods or throw light upon its crimes." 
- Abraham  Lincoln 

"The division of the United States into federations of equal  force was decided long before the Civil War by the high financial powers of  Europe. These bankers were afraid that the US, if they remained as one block, and as one nation, would attain economic and financial independence, which would upset their financial domination over the world." 
- Otto von  Bismarck, Chancellor of Germany, 1876 

"The Government should create,  issue, and circulate all the currency and credits needed to satisfy the  spending power of the Government and the buying power of consumers. The privilege of creating and issuing money is not only the supreme prerogative of Government, but it is the Government's greatest creative opportunity. By the adoption of these principles...the taxpayers will be saved immense sums of interest [by not having to borrow from privately-owned corporate banks]...Money will cease to be master and become the servant of humanity.  Democracy will rise superior to the money power." 
- Abraham Lincoln, Senate Document 23, Page 91, 1865 

"I see in the near future a crisis approaching that unnerves me and causes me to tremble for the safety of my country. Corporations have been enthroned, an era of corruption in high places will follow, and the money power of the country will endeavour to prolong its reign by working upon the prejudices of the people (e.g., by pitting the cooperation-oriented political left against the competition-oriented political  right), until the wealth is aggregated in the hands of a few, and the Republic  is destroyed. I feel at this moment more anxiety for the safety of my country than ever before, even in the midst of the war." 
- Abraham Lincoln  

"The death of Lincoln was a disaster for Christendom. There was no man in the United States great enough to wear his boots and the bankers went anew to grab the riches. I fear that foreign bankers with their craftiness and tortuous tricks will entirely control the exuberant riches of America and use it to systematically corrupt modern civilization." 
- Otto von Bismarck, Chancellor of Germany, after Lincoln's assassination 

"Right after the Civil War there was considerable talk about reviving Lincoln's brief experiment with the Constitutional monetary system. Had not the European money-trust intervened, it would have no doubt become an established institution." 
- W. Cleon Skousen 

"If that mischievous financial policy which had its origin in the North American Republic [i.e., honest Constitutionally authorized debt-free money] should become indurated down to a fixture, then that government will furnish its own money without cost. It will pay off its debts and be without a debt (to the International Bankers). It will have all the money necessary to carry on its commerce. It will become prosperous beyond precedent in the history of the civilized governments of the world. The brains and wealth of all countries will go to North America. That government must be destroyed or it will destroy every monarchy on the globe."  
- The Hazard Circular (England), distributed to bankers and wealthy aristocrats prior to the Civil War, 1862 
" A great industrialized nation is controlled by its system of credit. Our system of credit is concentrated. The growth of the nation, therefore, and all our activities are in the hands of a few men. We have come to be one of the worst ruled, one of the most completely controlled and dominated Governments in the civilized world --- no longer a Government by free opinion, no longer a Government by conviction and the vote of the majority, but a Government by the opinion and duress of small groups of dominent men." (Pres. Wilson 1919)
Senate document 23, p. 91, 1865
“We have given the People of this Republic the greatest blessing they have ever had, their own currency to pay their own debts."
- Abraham Lincoln
  After Congress passed his law issuing “Greenbacks”

Money is the means of facilitating the exchange of goods and services. There is nothing wrong with creating it out of nothing, because this is the only way to provide the means of exchange. The amount that is printed or created simply needs to be matched to the amount of economic activity that is taking place. What is wrong is that the right to do this has been allowed to pass to private interests who create it as loans for private profit. 

U. S. President Abraham Lincoln considered it a primary duty of the government to provide a nation with the medium of exchange to enable the economy to function.
"I went to America in the winter of 1872-73, authorised to secure, if I could, the passage of a bill demonetising silver.  It was in the interest of those I represented - the governors of the Bank of England - to have it done. By 1873, gold coins were the only form of coin money." 
- Ernest Seyd, agent of Bank of England 

"Corporate entities are persons, under the law. They are separate persons from the very real human persons who own them and run them. We have the Supreme Court of the United States to thank for this perversion. Through corruption of our government and courts, corporations subverted their original intended purpose and acquired the legal status of "natural persons" while also preserving their imited-liability legal protections (which results in corporate 'citizens' having more legal rights than human citizens do). This subversion was institutionalized in an 1886 Supreme Court decision of which Justice William O. Douglas would later write, "There was no history, logic, or reason given to support that view." Thus, corporations gained Bill of Rights protections, and more, even before women and minorities had full protection. We are currently living in an era of sophisticated corporation-state feudalism." 
[Anonymous] 
      
  Larry Parks, Executive Director, FAME  "With the monetary system we have now, the careful saving of a lifetime can be wiped out in an eyeblink."
                                     
  George Bernard Shaw  “You have to choose [as a voter] between trusting to the natural stability of gold and the natural stability of the honesty and intelligence of the members of the Government. And, with due respect for these gentlemen, I advise you, as long as the Capitalist system lasts, to vote for gold.”  
  Voltaire (1694-1778) “Paper money eventually returns to its intrinsic value ---- zero.”  
  Daniel Webster, 
speech in the Senate,1833 “We are in danger of being overwhelmed with irredeemable paper, mere paper, representing not gold nor silver; no sir, representing nothing but broken promises, bad faith, bankrupt corporations, cheated creditors and a ruined people.”  
  Thomas Jefferson to 
John Taylor, 1816 “I sincerely believe ... that banking establishments are more dangerous than standing armies, and that the principle of spending money to be paid by posterity under the name of funding is but swindling futurity on a large scale.”  
  Daniel Webster "Of all the contrivances for cheating the laboring classes of mankind, none has been more effective than that which deludes them with paper money."  
  St. Louis Federal Reserve Bank, 
Review, Nov. 1975, p.22 "The decrease in purchasing power incurred by holders of money due to inflation imparts gains to the issuers of money--."  
  Federal Reserve Bank, New York  
The Story of Banks, p.5.  "Because of 'fractional' reserve system, banks, as a whole, can expand our money supply several times, by making loans and investments."  
  Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia, 
Gold, p. 10 "Without the confidence factor, many believe a paper money system is liable to collapse eventually."  
  Federal reserve Bank of New York,  
I Bet You Thought, p.19 "Commercial banks create checkbook money whenever they grant a loan, simply by adding new deposit dollars in accounts on their books in exchange for a borrower's IOU."  
  Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago.  
Modern Money Mechanics, p.3 "The actual process of money creation takes place in commercial banks. As noted earlier, demand liabilities of commercial banks are money."  
  U.S. Supreme Court, 
Craig v. Missouri, 
4 Peters 410.  "Emitting bills of credit, or the creation of money by private corporations, is what is expressly forbidden by Article 1, Section 10 of the U.S. Constitution." 
  James A. Garfield "Whoever controls the volume of money in any country is absolute master of all industry and commerce."  
  Frederic Bastiat, 
The Law "When plunder becomes a way of life for a group of men living together in society, they create for themselves in the course of time a legal system that authorizes it and a moral code that glorifies it." 
  Irving Fisher, 
100% Money "Thus, our national circulating medium is now at the mercy of loan transactions of banks, which lend, not money, but promises to supply money they do not possess." 
  John Maynard Keynes,  
The Economic Consequences of the Peace,  
1920, page 240 "If, however, a government refrains from regulations and allows matters to take their course, essential commodities soon attain a level of price out of the reach of all but the rich, the worthlessness of the money becomes apparent, and the fraud upon the public can be concealed no longer."  
  John Maynard Keynes,  
The Economic Consequences of the Peace, 
1920, page 235ff  "Lenin is said to have declared that the best way to destroy the Capitalistic System was to debauch the currency. . .  Lenin was certainly right. There is no subtler, no surer means of overturning the existing basis of society than to debauch the currency. The process engages all the hidden forces of economic law on the side of destruction, and does it in a manner which not one man in a million can diagnose."  
  Ralph M. Hawtrey, 
former Secretary of Treasury, 
England "Banks lend by creating credit. They create the means of payment out of nothing."  
  Robert H. Hemphill, 
former credit manager, 
Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta “Money is the most important subject intellectual persons can investigate and reflect upon. It is so important that our present civilization may collapse unless it is widely understood and its defects remedied very soon."  
  Sir Josiah Stamp, former President, 
Bank of England "Bankers own the earth. Take it away from them, but leave them the power to create money and control credit, and with a flick of a pen they will create enough to buy it back.”
  Rt. Hon. Reginald McKenna, former 
Chancellor of Exchequer, England "Those who create and issue money and credit direct the policies of government and hold in the hollow of their hands the destiny of the people."  
  John Adams, letter to 
Thomas Jefferson "All the perplexities, confusion and distresses in America arise not from defects in the constitution or confederation, nor from want of honor or virtue, as much from downright ignorance of the nature of coin, credit, and circulation.
  Wm. Jennings Bryan "Money power denounces, as public enemies, all who question its methods or throw light upon its crimes."  
  George Washington, in letter to 
J. Bowen, Rhode Island, 
Jan. 9, 1787 "Paper money has had the effect in your state that it will ever have, to ruin commerce, oppress the honest, and open the door to every species of fraud and injustice."  
  George Bancroft,  
A Plea for the Constitution (1886) "Madison, agreeing with the journal of the convention, records that the grant of power to emit bills of credit was refused by a majority of more than four to one. The evidence is perfect; no power to emit paper money was granted to the legislature of the United States."  
  Article One, Section Ten,  
United States Constitution "No state shall emit bills of credit, make any thing but gold and silver coin a tender in payment of debts, coin money---."  
  John C. Calhoun, 
Speech 5/27/1836 "A power has risen up in the government greater than the people themselves, consisting of many and various powerful interest, combined in one mass; and held together by the cohesive power of the vast surplus in banks."  
  Andrew Jackson: To delegation of 
bankers discussing the 
Bank Renewal Bill, 1832 "You are a den of vipers and thieves. I intend to rout you out, and by the eternal God, I will rout you out."  
  Treasury Secretary Woodin, 
3/7/33 "Where would we be if we had I.O.U.'s scrip and certificates floating all around the country?" Instead he decided to "issue currency against the sound assets of the banks. [As opposed to issuing currency against gold.] The Federal Reserve Act lets us print all we'll need. And it won't frighten the people. It won't look like stage money. It'll be money that looks like real money."  'Closed for the Holiday: The Bank Holiday of 1933', p20 - Federal Reserve Bank of Boston)  

  John Kenneth Galbraith “The study of money, above all other fields in economics, is one in which complexity is used to disguise truth or to evade truth, not to reveal it.” Money: Whence it came, where it went - 1975, p15  
  
John Kenneth Galbraith “The process by which banks create money is so simple that the mind is repelled.”  
Money: Whence it came, where it went - 1975, p29  

  Senator Carter Glass, 
Author of the Banking Act of 1933 "Is there any reason why the American people should be taxed to guarantee the debts of banks, any more than they should be taxed to guarantee the debts of other institutions, including merchants, the industries, and the mills of the country?"  
    Chief Justice Salmon Chase, formerly Secretary of Treasury in President Lincoln’s administration, in dissent of Knox vs. Lee (The Legal Tender Cases, 1871)
  
  “The legal tender quality [of money] is only valuable for the purposes of dishonesty.”  
  Dr. Alan Greenspan, Chairman of the Federal Reserve Board of Governors, 11/20/2003 "As long as we issue fiat currency, I see no alternative to a legal tender law."  
  John Adams "All the perplexities, confusion and distress in America arise, not from defects in their Constitution or Confederation, not from want of honor or virtue, so much as from the downright ignorance of the nature of coin, credit and circulation."  
    Friedrich A. Hayek (1899-1992) Austrian Economist, Author and 1974 Nobel Prize-Winner for Economics
 “With the exception only of the period of the gold standard, practically all governments of history have used their exclusive power to issue money to defraud and plunder the people.”   
 
 Dr. Edwin Vieira, FAME Foundation Scholar "You can fool some of the people all of the time, and all of the people some of the time, and that's good enough."

"Unless you become more watchful in your states and check this spirit of monopoly and thirst for exclusive privileges, you will in the end find that the most important powers of government have been given or bartered away, and the control of your dearest interests have been passed into  the hands of these corporations." 
- Andrew Jackson 

"If congress has the right under the Constitution to issue paper money, it was given them to use themselves, not to be delegated to individuals or corporations." 
-  Andrew Jackson 

"You (International Bankers) are a den of vipers and thieves. I intend to rout you out, and by the Eternal God, I will rout you out. If the American people only understood the rank injustice of our money and banking system, there would be a revolution before morning." 
- Andrew Jackson in an address to Congress, 1829 

"The bold effort the present bank has made to control the Government, the distress it has wantonly  produced...are but premonitions of the fate that awaits the American People  should they be deluded into a perpetuation of this institution [The Bank of  the United States], or the establishment of another like it." 
- Andrew Jackson 

"History records that the money changers have used every form  of abuse, intrigue, deceit, and violent means possible to maintain their  control over governments by controlling money and its issuance." 
- James Madison 

"Permit me to issue and control the money of a nation and I care not who makes the laws." 
- Mayer Amschel Rothschild, founder of the Rothschild international banking dynasty, 1790 

"Whomsoever controls the volume of money in any country is absolute master of all industry and  commerce and when you realize that the entire system is very easily  controlled, one way or another, by a few powerful men at the top, you will not  have to be told how periods of inflation and depression originate." 
-  James Garfield, assassinated within weeks of release of this statement during the first year of his presidency in 1881 

"I am afraid that ordinary citizens will not like to be told that the banks can, and do, create and destroy money. And they who control the credit of the nation direct the policy of governments, and hold in the hollow of their hands the destiny of the people." 
- Reginald McKenna, Chancellor of the Exchequer of England, Chairman of the Board of Midlands Bank, 1924 in his book,”Post War Banking.” 

"From the days of Spartacist-Wieshaupt to those of Karl Marx, and down to Trotsky, Bela Kuhn, Rosa Luxemburg, and Emma Goldman, this world (Jewish) conspiracy for the overthrow of civilization and for the reconstitution of society on the basis of arrested development, of envious malevolence, and impossible equality, has been steadily growing. This conspiracy played a definite recognizable role in the tragedy of the French revolution. It has been the mainspring of every subversive movement during the 19th century. And now at last this band of extraordinary personalities from the underworld of the great cities of Europe and America have gripped the Russian people by the hair of their head and have become the undisputed masters of that enormous empire." 
- Winston  Churchill in the Illustrated Sunday Herald, February 8, 1920 

"Behind  the October Revolution there are more influential personalities than the  thinkers and executors of Marxism." 
- Lenin 

"Marxists can always be relied upon to defend the International Bankers, to their dying breath, by  portraying capitalism as some sort of vague, accidental ideological  abstraction that either everybody or nobody is truly responsible for, rather  than as a very specific, profoundly evil system perpetrated by very specific  individuals, who are acting with full intention to drain the lifeblood from  the Republic until it is dead. This fact alone should be enough to raise suspicion of the Marxists' real intention, which is to focus primarily on property-based 'class' conflict without ever clearly defining the real methods by which the ruling 'class' stays in power, so that they can attempt to convince the public that these methods are some kind of magic that only Marxist intellectuals can understand and con them into merely replacing the existing capitalist tyrannical order with a communist one. The Marxists are totally anti-democratic and seem to truly envy the money power more than they despise it." 
- [Anonymous] 
"This is a staggering thought. We are completely dependent on the commercial banks. Someone has to borrow every dollar we have in circulation, cash or credit. If the banks create ample synthetic money we are prosperous; if not, we starve. We are absolutely without a permanent money system. When one gets a complete grasp of the picture, the tragic absurdity of our hopeless position is almost incredible, but there it is. It is the most important subject intelligent persons can investigate and reflect upon. It is so important that our present civilization may collapse unless it becomes widely understood and the defects remedied very soon." 
- Robert H. Hamphill, Credit Manager, Atlanta Federal Reserve Bank  

"While economic textbooks claim that people and corporations are competing for markets and resources, I claim that in reality they are competing for money - using markets and resources to do so. Greed and fear of scarcity are being continuously created and amplified as a direct result of the kind of money we are using. For example, we can produce more than enough food to feed everybody, and there is definitely not enough work for everybody in the world, but there is clearly not enough money to pay for it all. In fact, the job of central banks is to create and maintain that currency scarcity. Money is created when banks lend it into existence When a bank provides you with a $100,000 mortgage, it creates only the principal, which you spend and which then circulates in the economy. The bank expects you to pay back $200,000 over the next 20 years, but it doesn't create the second $100,000 - the interest. Instead, the bank sends you out into the tough world to battle against everybody else to bring back the second $100,000." 
-  Bernard Lietaer, Former Central Banker 

"In addition to almost unlimited usury, the bankers have another method of drawing vast amounts of wealth. The banks are able to approve or disapprove large loans to large and successful corporations to the extent that refusal of a loan will bring about a reduction in the selling price of the corporation's stock. After depressing the price, the bankers' agents buy large blocks of the company's stock. Then, if the bank suddenly approves a multi-million--dollar loan to the company, the stock rises and is then sold for a profit. In this manner, billions of dollars are made with which to buy more stock. This practice is so refined today that the Federal Reserve Board need only announce to the newspapers an increase or decrease in their "discount rate" to send stocks soaring or crashing at their whim. Banks collect billions in interest by loaning to Government and the Corporations." 
- Pastor Sheldon Emry

"Examining the organization and function of the Federal Reserve Banks and applying the relevant factors, we conclude that the Federal Reserve Banks are not Federal  instrumentalities...but are independent and privately owned and controlled  corporations...Federal Reserve Banks are listed neither as 'wholly owned'  government corporations [under 31 U.S.C. Section 846] nor as 'mixed ownership'  corporations [under 31 U.S.C. Section 856]...It is evident from the  legislative history of the Federal Reserve Act that Congress did not intend to  give the Federal government direction over the daily operation of the Reserve  Banks...The fact that the Federal Reserve Board regulates the Reserve Banks  does not make them Federal agencies under the Act...Unlike typical Federal  agencies, each bank is empowered to hire and fire employees at will. Bank employees do not participate in the Civil Service Retirement System. They are covered by worker's compensation insurance, purchased by the Bank, rather than the Federal Employees Compensation Act. Employees traveling on Bank business are not subject to Federal travel regulations and do not receive government employee discounts on lodging and services..." 
- Lewis vs. U.S., case #80-5905, 9th Circuit, June 24, 1982 

"The financial system has been turned over to the Federal Reserve Board. That Board administers the finance system by authority of a purely profiteering group. The system is private, conducted for the sole purpose of obtaining the greatest possible profits from the use of other people's money." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindbergh Sr.,1923 

"Some people think that the Federal Reserve Banks are United  States Government institutions. They are not Government institutions. They are private credit monopolies which prey upon the people of these United States for the benefit of themselves and their foreign customers; foreign and domestic speculators and swindlers; and rich and predatory money lenders."  
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, 1932 

"The Federal Reserve Bank is nothing but a banking fraud and an unlawful crime against civilization. Why?  Because they "create" the money made out of nothing, and our Uncle Sam Government issues their "Federal Reserve Notes" and stamps our Government approval with NO obligation whatever from these Federal Reserve Banks,  Individual Banks or National Banks, etc." 
- H.L. Birum, Sr., American  Mercury Magazine, August 1957 

"A disordered currency is one of the  greatest political evils. It undermines the virtues necessary for the support of the social system, and encourages propensities destructive to its happiness. It wars against industry, frugality and economy, and it fosters evil spirits of extravagance and speculation. Of all the contrivances for cheating the laboring classes of mankind, none has been more effectual than that which deludes them with paper money." 
- Congressman Daniel Webster, 1846 


"The depression was the calculated 'shearing' of the public by the World Money powers, triggered by the planned sudden shortage of supply of call money in the New York money market...The One World Government leaders and their ever close bankers have now acquired full control of the money and credit machinery of the U.S. via the creation of the privately owned Federal Reserve Bank." 
- Curtis Dall, Franklin D. Roosevelt's son-in-law, as quoted from his book, "My Exploited Father-in-Law"
"The Federal Reserve banks are one of the most corrupt institutions the world has ever seen. There is not a man within the sound of my voice who does not know that this nation is run by the International Bankers." 
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, 1934 

"Every effort has been made by the Fed to conceal its powers - but the truth is - the Fed has usurped the Government. It controls everything here and it controls all of our foreign relations. It makes and breaks governments at will." 
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, 1934 

"Most Americans have no real understanding of the operation of the international money lenders...The accounts of the Federal Reserve System have never been audited. It operates outside the control of Congress and manipulates the credit of the United States." 
- Barry Goldwater, Republican Senator from Arizona 

"From now on, depressions will be scientifically created." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindbergh Sr., 1913 

"There does exist and has existed for a generation, an international Anglophile network which operates, to some extent, in the way the radical right believes the Communists act. In fact, this network, which we may identify as the Round Table groups, has no aversion to cooperating with the Communists, or any other groups, and frequently does so. I know of the operations of this network because I have studied it for 20 years and was permitted for two years, in the early 1960s, to examine its papers and secret record." 
- Carroll Quigley, Professor of History at Georgetown University (deceased) in his book "Tragedy and Hope: A History of the World in Our Time", 1966 
"The powers of financial capitalism had another far-reaching aim, nothing less than to create a world system of financial control in private hands able to dominate the political system of each country and the economy of the world as a whole. This system was to be controlled in a feudalist fashion by the central banks of the world acting in concert, by secret agreements, arrived at in frequent private meetings and conferences. The apex of the system was the Bank for International Settlements in Basel, Switzerland, a private bank owned and controlled by the world's central banks which were themselves private corporations. The growth of financial capitalism made possible a centralization of world economic control and use of this power for the direct benefit of financiers and the indirect injury of all other economic groups."  
- Carroll Quigley, Professor of History at Georgetown University.  

"In a small Swiss city [Basel] sits an international organization so obscure and secretive [that few people know about it].Control of the  institution, the Bank for International Settlements, lies with some of the  world's most powerful and least visible men; the heads of 32 central banks,  officials able to shift billions of dollars and alter the course of economies  at the stroke of a pen." 
- Keith Bradsher of the New York Times, August 5,1995 

"The Federal Reserve Bank of New York is eager to enter into  close relationship with the Bank for International Settlements...The  conclusion is impossible to escape that the State and Treasury Departments are  willing to pool the banking systems of Europe and America, setting up a world  financial power independent of and above the Government of the United States."  
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, Chairman of the House Committee on Banking and Currency, quoted from the New York Times, June 1930 

"Ever since the Civil War, Congress has allowed the bankers to control financial legislation. The membership of the Finance Committee in the Senate [now the Banking and Currency Committee] and the Committee on Banking and Currency in the House have been made up chiefly of bankers, their agents, and their attorneys...In this way the committees have been able to control legislation in the interests of the few." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindberg, Sr.  

"If I told you I thought the world was controlled by a handful of capitalists and corporate bosses, you would say I was a left-winger, but if I told you who I thought the capitalists and corporate bosses were, you would say I was far right." 
Anonymous Anarchist Black Blocker 

"Left and Right are monolithic ideas - colossal, abstract, and, as their religious origins suggest, cosmic. They are part of the darker side of humanity that replaces the specific with the general, the personal with the impersonal. If you wanted to find a way of making certain that people would have as little as possible in common, there would be no better way than to divide them, not into ten or three or four, but into two. Dual division turns the largest possible sections of humanity against one another, often causing neighbors and compatriots to have nothing to say to one another. No regeneration of community can begin without a careful demolition of Left and Right; nor can this tearing down be relinquished to academic abstraction, technical philosophy, government, corporations, or ideology. Nothing can be built without a new politics - least of all with a politics that refers outward to ideas of Heaven and Hell rather than inward to the experience of daily life." 
- Hugh Graham, in his book "The Vestibule of Hell: Why Left and Right Have Never Made Sense in Politics and Life" 

"This isn't just your normal case of shrill, success-hating, bleeding-heart, eat-the-rich, lawsuit-happy, commie-liberal bed-wetters versus slack-jawed, pinheaded, war-mongering, Bible-thumping, woman-hating, eco-rapist knuckle-draggers. But it is politics as usual." 

"Communism is fascism with a human face." 
- Susan Sontag  

"Obviously, neither communism nor fascism has any interest whatsoever in democracy; they both claim that democracy is an unrealistic Utopian fantasy. In fact, they both use each other as convenient scapegoats for their own crimes against democracy and human rights. True autonomist democracy can only emerge from a radically centered anarchist-libertarian philosophy that values competition and cooperation equally, the so-called meta-political 'third-position', which is the greatest threat to both the left and right extremes. The real struggle that is going on in the world today is the struggle for democracy against ALL tyranny, not merely 'class war' to replace the tyrannical fiscal aristocracy with some despotic peasant-emperor. Phoney third-positionism is easy to reveal because it embraces both fascist and communist principles, rather than rejecting them." 

"An anarchist who does not learn the real agenda behind anarcho-Communism and anarcho-Fascism will not remain a Real Anarchist for very long. Crypto-communist and crypto-fascist subversion is the most serious threat to any emerging autonomist democracy." 

"My political opinions lean more and more to anarchy (philosophically understood, meaning abolition of control not whiskered men with bombs). There is only one bright spot and that is the growing habit of disgruntled men of dynamiting factories and power stations." 
- J.R.R. Tolkien, in "Letters of J.R.R.  Tolkien" 

"So you see my dear Coningsby, the world is governed by very different personages to what is imagined by those who are not behind the scenes." 
- Benjamin Disraeli, Prime Minister of Britain in his book, “Coningsby.”

"The real rulers in Washington are invisible and exercise power from behind the scenes." 
- Justice Felix Frankfurter, Former U.S. Supreme Court Justice 

"The real truth of the matter is, as you and I know, that a financial element in the large centers has owned the government of the U.S. since the days of Andrew Jackson." 
Franklin D. Roosevelt 

"The true equation is "democracy" = government by world financiers." 
- J.R.R. Tolkien, in "The Letters of J.R.R. Tolkien"  

"The main mark of modern governments is that we do not know who governs, de facto any more than de jure. We see the politician and not his backer; still less the backer of the backer; or, what is most important of all, the banker of the backer." 
- J.R.R. Tolkien, in "The Letters of J.R.R. Tolkien" 

"Throned above all, in a manner without parallel in all past, is the veiled prophet of finance, swaying all men living by a sort of magic, and delivering oracles in a language not understood of the people."  
- J.R.R. Tolkien, in "The Letters of J.R.R. Tolkien" 

"Since I entered politics, I have chiefly had men's views confided to me privately.  Some of the biggest men in the United States, in the field of commerce and manufacture, are afraid of something. They know that there is a power somewhere so organized, so subtle, so watchful, so interlocked, so complete, so pervasive, that they better not speak above their breath when they speak in condemnation of it." 
- Woodrow Wilson, 1913 

"The real menace of our republic is this invisible government which like a giant octopus sprawls its slimy length over city, state and nation. Like the octopus of real life, it operates under cover of a self created screen...At the head of this octopus are the Rockefeller Standard Oil interests and a small group of powerful banking houses generally referred to as international bankers. The little coterie of powerful international bankers virtually run the United States government for their own selfish purposes. They practically control both political parties." 
- John F. Hylan, New York City Mayor, 1922  

"The rich will strive to establish their dominion and enslave the rest. They always did...they always will. They will have the same effect here as elsewhere, if we do not, by the power of government, keep them in their proper spheres." 
- Gouvernor Morris, head of the committee that wrote the final draft of the U.S. Constitution 

"This (Federal Reserve) Act establishes the most gigantic trust [monopoly] on earth. When the President (Woodrow Wilson) signs this bill, the invisible government by the Monetary Power will be legalized. The people may not know it immediately, but the day of reckoning is only a few years removed. The trusts will soon realize that they have gone too far even for their own good. The people must make a declaration of independence to relieve themselves from the Monetary Power.  This they will be able to do by taking control of Congress. Wall Street could not cheat us if you Senators and Representatives did not make a humbug of Congress...The greatest crime of Congress is its currency system. The worst legislative crime of the ages is perpetrated by this banking bill. The caucus and the party bosses have again operated and prevented the people from getting the benefit of their own government." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindbergh, Sr., 1913 

"I am a most unhappy man. I have unwittingly ruined my country. A great industrial nation is controlled by its system of credit. Our system of credit is concentrated. The growth of the nation, therefore, and all our activities are in the hands of a few men. We have come to be one of the worst ruled, one of the most completely controlled and dominated governments in the civilized world, no longer a government by free opinion, no longer a government by conviction and the vote of the majority, but a government by the opinion and duress of a small group of dominant men." 
- President Woodrow Wilson  

"Suppose you go to Washington and try to get at your government. You will always find that while you are politely listened to, the men really consulted are the big men who have the biggest stakes - the big bankers, the big manufacturers, the big masters of commerce... Every time it has come to a critical question, these gentlemen have been yielded to, and their demands treated as the demands that should be followed as a matter of course. The government of the United States is a foster child of the special interests."  
- Woodrow Wilson, 1912 

"If monopoly persists, monopoly will always sit at the helm of government. I do not expect monopoly to restrain itself. If there are men in this country big enough to own the government of the United States, they are going to own it." 
- Woodrow Wilson 

"I have never seen more senators express discontent with their jobs...I think the major cause is that, deep down in our hearts, we have been accomplices to doing something terrible and unforgivable to this wonderful country. Deep down in our hearts, we know that we have bankrupted America and that we have given our children a legacy of bankruptcy...We have defrauded our country to get ourselves elected." 
- John Danforth, Republican senator from Missouri, reported in the Arizona Republic of April 21, 1992 

"When a government is dependent upon bankers for money, they and not the leaders of the government control the situation, since the hand that gives is above the hand that takes...Money has no motherland; financiers are without patriotism and  without decency; their sole object is gain." 
- Napoleon Bonaparte, 1815  

"Capital must protect itself in every way...Debts must be collected and loans and mortgages foreclosed as soon as possible. When through a process of law ,the common people have lost their homes, they will be more tractable and more easily governed by the strong arm of the law applied by the central power of leading financiers. People without homes will not quarrel with their leaders. This is well known among our principal men now engaged in forming an imperialism of capitalism to govern the world. By dividing the people, we can get them to expend their energies in fighting over questions of no importance to us except as teachers of the common herd." 
- Taken from the Civil Servants' Year Book, "The Organizer", January 1934 

"It [Central Bank] gives the National Bank almost complete control of national finance. Those few who understand the system [check book money and credit] will either be so interested in its profits, or so dependant on its favours, that there will be no opposition from that class, while on the other hand, the great body of the people, mentally incapable of comprehending the tremendous advantage that capital derives from the system, will bear its burden without complaint, and perhaps without even suspecting that the system is inimical [contrary] to  their interests." 
- Rothschild Brothers of London, 1863 

"...the lord and master of the money markets of the world, and of course virtually  lord and master of everything else. He literally held the revenues of southern Italy in pawn, and monarchs and ministers of all countries courted his advice and were guided by his suggestions." 
- Benjamin Disraeli, Prime Minister of Britain, describing Baron Nathan Rothschild in his novel, "Coningsby: Or the New Generation" 
“So you see my dear Coningsby, the world is governed by different personages from what is imagined by those not behind the scenes.” Benjamin Disraeli, former Prime Minister of Britain, in his novel “Coningsby.”

"When the conflict with France ended (at the battle of Waterloo) the House of Rothschild was in control of British finance and was the official banker of the British Government. This odd financial octopus was acknowledged to be in some respects the greatest power on the earth and was acknowledged by some writers as the 'Sixth Great Power of Europe'." 
- E.C. Knuth, in his book "The Empire of The City" 

"The Federal Reserve Bank is pretty secretive about who it's owning banks or shareholders are. It has been determined that the "class A" stock in the Federal Reserve Bank are held by the following 8 institutions: Rothschild Banks of London and Berlin, Lazard Brothers Bank of Paris, Israel Moses Seif Bank of Italy, Warburg Bank of Hamburg and Amsterdam, Lehman Bank of New York, Kuhn Loeb Bank of New York, Chase Manhattan Bank of New York, Goldman Sachs Bank of New York. The Remaining Stock is held by the Chemical Trust and the Rockefeller Trust. These stockholders hold Federal Government Obligations which amount to about $6 Trillion Dollars - The entire U.S. National Debt.  Their annual profits from interest payments are over $200 Billion dollars per year." 
[Anonymous] 
"The drive of the Rockefellers and their allies is to create a one-world government combining super-capitalism and communism under the same tent, all under their control...Do I mean conspiracy? Yes, I do. I am convinced there is such a plot, international in scope, generations old in planning, and incredibly evil in intent." 
- Congressman Larry P. McDonald, 1976, killed in the Korean Airlines 747 (flight KAL007) that was shot down by the Soviets

"It comes as news to most people to learn that practically all-important ethical teachers - Moses, Aristotle, Jesus, Mohammed, and Saint Thomas Aquinas, for instance - have denounced lending at interest as usury and as morally wrong." 
- Lawrence Dennis, Saturday Review of Literature 661, June 24, 1933

"Bill Gates is not the 'richest man in the world' by a long shot. His $50 billion-dollar fortune (give or take) is virtually nothing compared to the wealth and economic power of the House of Rothschild. Baron Jacob Rothschild (who controls the Rothschild banking dynasty) is owed approximately half of the U.S. national debt (which is now some $6 trillion dollars) because the privately-owned Rothschild Bank and its proxies have a 51 percent ownership and controlling interest in the U.S. Federal Reserve System; and this $3 trillion dollar amount obviously does not even include the debt that many other nations ultimately owe to the Rothschild banking network. The interest payments alone provide the Rothschild Bank with $100 billion dollars per year. The reason that the Rothschild dynasty remains generally obscure to the public is because virtually all of their assets are privately-owned and they are very carefully protected from public scrutiny by various ways and means. It has been estimated that the House of Rothschild, directly or indirectly, controls a very substantial portion of the $35 trillion dollars in total overall spending power that exists in the world today." 
[Anonymous] 
"There is no such thing, at this date of the world's history, in America, as an independent press. You know it and I know it. There is not one of you who dares to write your honest opinions, and if you did, you know beforehand that it will never appear in print. I am paid weekly for keeping my honest opinions out of the paper I am connected with. Others of you are paid similar salaries for similar things, and any of you who would be so foolish as to write honest opinions would be out on the streets looking for another job.  If I allowed my honest opinions to appear in one issue of my paper, before twenty-four hours my occupation would be gone. The business of the journalist is to destroy the truth; to lie outright; to pervert; to vilify; to fawn at the feet of Mammon, and to sell his country and his race for his daily bread.  You know it and I know it and what folly is this toasting an independent press? We are the tools and vassels for rich men behind the scenes. We are the jumping jacks, they pull the strings and we dance. Our talents, our possibilities and our lives are the property of other men. We are intellectual prostitutes." 
- John Swinton, Former Chief of Staff of the New York Times, called by his peers "The Dean of his profession", was asked in 1953 to give a toast before the New York Press Club 

"Your money's value is determined by a global casino of unprecedented proportions: $2 trillion are traded per day in foreign exchange markets, 100 times more than the trading volume of all the stock markets of the world combined. Only 2% of these foreign exchange transactions relate to the "real" economy reflecting movements of real goods and services in the world, and 98% are purely speculative. This global casino is triggering the foreign exchange crisis which shook Mexico in 1994-5, Asia in 1997 and Russia in 1998. These emergencies are the dislocation symptoms of the old Industrial Age money system." 
- Bernard Lietaer, Former Central Banker in his book "The Future of Money" 

"To ignore the pivotal role played by particular individuals who are in positions of power is to do violence to historical accuracy. A recognition that the course of economic events can be influenced by individuals who have the imagination and the power to take advantage of prevailing conditions does not constitute acceptance of a 'conspiracy' theory of history." 
- John Blair, Former Chief Economist for the U.S. Senate Subcommittee on Anti-Trust and Monopoly 

"The modern banking system manufactures money out of nothing. The process is perhaps the most astounding piece of sleight of hand that was ever invented. Banking was conceived in iniquity and was born in sin. The Bankers own the earth. Take it away from them, but leave them the power to create deposits, and with the flick of the pen they will create enough deposits to buy it all back again.  However, take this great power away from them, and all the great fortunes like mine disappear, and they ought to disappear, for this would be a happier and better world to live in. But, if you wish to remain the slaves of Bankers and pay the cost of your own slavery, let them continue to create money and control credit." 
- Sir Josiah Stamp, President of the Bank of England in the 1920s, the second richest man in Britain 

"A civilization based on  a system of parasitic usury economics will ultimately destroy itself, because  fractional-reserve 'banking', combined with compound 'interest', is truly and  totally contrary to the modern "Establishment" economic theory that it  represents some kind of perpetual-motion machine. Our economic system was not designed to, nor was it intended to, function honorably for the benefit and general prosperity of all; it was specifically designed to create a nation of debt slaves under the control of a molesting central bank. The perpetrators of the system understand fully that it is finite and must inevitably collapse in a state of insoluble debt, but by that point they expect to have gained full and indisputable control over everything. The 450 richest people in the world have financial assets equal to the combined wealth of the 3 billion poorest; half of all humanity. The only possible explanation for this is that the international economic system has been subverted and corrupted by fully intentional activities, directed towards undermining national governments and creating institutionalized, privately-owned central banks throughout the world." 
- [Anonymous] 

"A nation of well-informed men who have been taught to know and prize the rights which God has given them cannot be enslaved. It is in the region of ignorance that tyranny begins." 
- Benjamin Franklin 

"In the colonies, we issue our own paper money. It is called 'Colonial Scrip'. We issue it in proper proportion to make the goods pass easily from the producers to the consumers.  In this manner, creating ourselves our own paper money, we control it's purchasing power and we have no interest to pay to anyone." 
- Benjamin Franklin, speaking at the London Parliament

"This is a staggering thought. We are completely dependent on the commercial banks. Someone has to borrow every dollar we have in circulation, cash or credit. If the banks create ample synthetic money we are prosperous; if not, we starve. We are absolutely without a permanent money system. When one gets a complete grasp of the picture, the tragic absurdity of our hopeless position is almost incredible, but there it is. It is the most important subject intelligent persons can investigate and reflect upon. It is so important that our present civilization may collapse unless it becomes widely understood and the defects remedied very soon." 
- Robert H. Hamphill, Credit Manager, Atlanta Federal Reserve Bank  

"While economic textbooks claim that people and corporations are competing for markets and resources, I claim that in reality they are  competing for money - using markets and resources to do so. Greed and fear of scarcity are being continuously created and amplified as a direct result of the kind of money we are using. For example, we can produce more than enough food to feed everybody, and there is definitely not enough work for everybody in the world, but there is clearly not enough money to pay for it all. In fact, the job of central banks is to create and maintain that currency scarcity. Money is created when banks lend it into existence When a bank provides you with a $100,000 mortgage, it creates only the principal, which you spend and which then circulates in the economy. The bank expects you to pay back $200,000 over the next 20 years, but it doesn't create the second $100,000 - the interest. Instead, the bank sends you out into the tough world to battle against everybody else to bring back the second $100,000." 
Bernard Lietaer, Former Central Banker 

"In addition to almost unlimited usury, the bankers have another method of drawing vast amounts of wealth. The banks are able to approve or disapprove large loans to large and successful corporations to the extent that refusal of a loan will bring about a reduction in the selling price of the corporation's stock. After depressing the price, the bankers' agents buy large blocks of the company's stock. Then, if the bank suddenly approves a multi-million-dollar loan to the company, the stock rises and is then sold for a profit. In this manner, billions of dollars are made with which to buy more stock. This practice is so refined today that the Federal Reserve Board need only announce to the newspapers an increase or decrease in their "discount rate" to send stocks soaring or crashing at their whim. Banks collect billions in interest by loaning to Government and the Corporations." 
- Pastor Sheldon Emry 

"The basis of money in today's world is not simply the trading of one thing of obvious value (say, a  gold coin) for another thing of obvious value (for example, a keg of beer)  which, in fact, would be more a form of barter than a modern day monetary  purchase. In the modern economy, the value of money is based strictly on mutual faith and faith alone - faith in pieces of paper signed by a central  banker as having whatever value he decides to give them, such as is the case  with Federal Reserve Notes. This faith that the paper has some kind of value is basically a game of "let's pretend" on the part of the banker supported only by the fact that the banker has seized control of the government and he  will not tolerate any uncontrolled standard of exchange to compete with his  official monopoly of interest-bearing usury 'money'. In essence, this means that every time you spend a Federal R eserve Note you are making a very profound expression of faith that the central banker is a kind of 'god' who can create value out of absolutely nothing because this is his 'holy' privelege. Not only that, but you also become perpetually, irreversibly indebted to him, as a form of 'worship', for his creating of the 'money' by the usury that he charges you for this 'service' (e.g., the U.S. 6 trillion - dollar debt). This is capitalism - a glorified pyramid scheme for making money off of money." 
- [Anonymous] 

"There is a large class of people who believe that paper can be, and ought to be, made into money without any promise or hope of redemption; that a note should be printed: "This is a dollar," and be made a legal tender. I regard this as a mild form of lunacy, and have no disposition to debate with men who indulge in such delusions, which have prevailed to some extent, at different times, in all countries, but whose life has been brief, and which have shared the fate of other popular delusions. The Supreme Court only maintained the constitutionality of the legal tender promise to pay a dollar by a divided court, and on the ground that it was issued in the nature of a forced loan, to be redeemed upon the  payment of a real dollar; that is, so many grains of silver or gold. I therefore dismiss such wild theories, and speak only to those who are willing  to assume, as an axiom, that gold and silver or coined money, have been proven  by all human experience to be the best possible standards of value, and that  paper money is simply a promise to pay such coined money, and should be made  and kept equal to coined money, by being convertible on demand." 
-  Secretary of Treasury John Sherman, 1877 

"I am firmly of the opinion that there never was a paper pound, a paper dollar, or a paper promise of any kind, that ever yet obtained a general currency (as money) but by force or  fraud, generally by both." 
- John Adams 
"By a continuing process of inflation, governments can confiscate, secretly and unobserved, an important part of the wealth of their citizens. There is no subtler, more sure way of overturning the existing basis of society than to debauch the currency. The process engages all the hidden forces of economic law on the side of destruction, and does it in a manner in which not one man in a million is able to diagnose." 
- John Maynard Keynes

"If ever again our nation stumbles upon unfunded paper, it shall surely be like death to our body politic. This country will crash." 
- George Washington 

"If the American people ever allow private banks to control the issue of their currency, first by inflation, then by deflation, (i.e., the "business cycle") the banks and corporations that will grow up around them will deprive the  people of all property until their children wake-up homeless on the continent  their fathers conquered." 
- Thomas Jefferson, The Debate Over The  Recharter Of The Bank Bill, 1809 

"Examining the organization and  function of the Federal Reserve Banks and applying the relevant factors, we  conclude that the Federal Reserve Banks are not Federal  instrumentalities...but are independent and privately owned and controlled  corporations...Federal Reserve Banks are listed neither as 'wholly owned'  government corporations [under 31 U.S.C. Section 846] nor as 'mixed ownership'  corporations [under 31 U.S.C. Section 856]...It is evident from the  legislative history of the Federal Reserve Act that Congress did not intend to  give the Federal government direction over the daily operation of the Reserve  Banks...The fact that the Federal Reserve Board regulates the Reserve Banks  does not make them Federal agencies under the Act...Unlike typical Federal  agencies, each bank is empowered to hire and fire employees at will. Bank employees do not participate in the Civil Service Retirement System. They are covered by worker's compensation insurance, purchased by the Bank, rather than the Federal Employees Compensation Act. Employees traveling on Bank business are not subject to Federal travel regulations and do not receive government employee discounts on lodging and services..." 
- Lewis vs. U.S., case #80-5905, 9th Circuit, June 24, 1982 

"The financial system has been turned over to the Federal Reserve Board. That Board administers the finance system by authority of a purely profiteering group. The system is private, conducted for the sole purpose of obtaining the greatest possible profits from the use of other people's money." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindbergh Sr.,1923 

" The study of money, above all other fields in economics, is one in which complexity is used to disguise truth or to evade truth, not to reveal it. The process by which banks create money is so simple that the mind is repelled." 
- John Kenneth Galbraith, in his book "Money: Whence It Came, Where It Went", 1975
“If the Government of the Commonwealth deliberately excluded itself from all participation in the making or changing of monetary policy it cannot govern except in a secondary degree.” Australian Prime Minister John Curtin.
On December 15, 1931 Rep. Louis T. McFadden, who for more than 10 years served as chairman of the Banking and Currency Committee in the House of Representatives, said: “The Federal Reserve Board and banks are the duly appointed agents of the foreign central banks of issue and they are more concerned with their foreign customers than they are with the people of the United States.  The only thing that is American about the Federal Reserve Board and Banks is the money they use…” 
On June 10, 1932, McFadden said in an address to the Congress: “We have in this country one of the most corrupt institutions the world has ever known.  I refer to the Federal Reserve Board and the Federal Reserve Banks…Some people think the Federal Reserve Banks are United States government institutions. They are not government institutions.  They are private credit monopolies which prey upon the people of the United States for the benefit of themselves and their foreign customers…The Federal Reserve Banks are the agents of the foreign central banks…In that dark crew of financial pirates, there are those who would cut a man’s throat to get a dollar out of his pocket…Every effort has been made by the Federal Reserve Board to conceal its powers, but the truth is the Fed has usurped the government.  It controls everything here (in Congress) and controls all our foreign relations.  It makes and breaks governments at will…When the Fed was passed, the people of the United States did not perceive that a world system was being set up…A super-state controlled by international bankers, and international industrialists acting together to enslave the world for their own pleasure!”

Sen. Barry Goldwater wrote in his book, "With No Apologies:" "Does it not seem strange to you that these men just happened to be CFR (Council on Foreign Relations) and just happened to be on the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve that absolutely controls the money and interest rates of this great country. A privately-owned organization …which has absolutely nothing to do with the United States of America."

"Some people think that the Federal Reserve Banks are United States Government institutions. They are not Government institutions. They are private credit monopolies which prey upon the people of these United States for the benefit of themselves and their foreign customers; foreign and domestic speculators and swindlers; and rich and predatory money lenders."  
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, 1932 

"The Federal Reserve Bank is nothing but a banking fraud and an unlawful crime against civilization. Why?  Because they "create" the money made out of nothing, and our Uncle Sam Government issues their "Federal Reserve Notes" and stamps our Government approval with NO obligation whatever from these Federal Reserve Banks, Individual Banks or National Banks, etc." 
- H.L. Birum, Sr., American Mercury Magazine, August 1957 

"A disordered currency is one of the  greatest political evils. It undermines the virtues necessary for the support of the social system, and encourages propensities destructive to its happiness. It wars against industry, frugality and economy, and it fosters evil spirits of extravagance and speculation. Of all the contrivances for cheating the laboring classes of mankind, none has been more effectual than that which deludes them with paper money." 
- Congressman Daniel Webster, 1846 

"The Federal Reserve banks are one of the most corrupt institutions the world has ever seen. There is not a man within the sound of my voice who does not know that this nation is run by the International Bankers." 
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, 1934 

"Every effort has been made by the Fed to conceal its powers - but the truth is - the Fed has usurped the Government. It controls everything here and it controls all of our foreign relations. It makes and breaks governments at will." 
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, 1934 

"Most Americans have no real understanding of the operation of the international money lenders...The accounts of the Federal Reserve System have never been audited. It operates outside the control of Congress and manipulates the credit of the United States." 
- Barry Goldwater, Republican Senator from Arizona 

"From now on, depressions will be scientifically created." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindbergh Sr., 1913 

"The depression was the calculated 'shearing' of the public by the World Money powers, triggered by the planned sudden shortage of supply of call money in the New York money market...The One World Government leaders and their ever close bankers have now acquired full control of the money and credit machinery of the U.S. via the creation of the privately owned Federal Reserve Bank." 
- Curtis Dall, Franklin D. Roosevelt's son-in-law, as quoted from his book, "My Exploited Father-in-Law" 

"The liberty of a democracy is not safe if the people tolerate the growth of private power to a point where it becomes stronger than the democratic state itself. That in its essence is fascism: ownership of government by an individual, by a group or any controlling private power." 
- Franklin D. Roosevelt
"If our nation can issue a dollar bond, it can issue a dollar bill. The element that makes the bond good, makes the bill good, also. The difference between the bond and the bill is the bond lets money brokers collect twice the amount of the bond and an additional 20%, whereas the currency pays nobody but those who contribute directly in some useful way. It is absurd to say that our country can issue $30 milion in bonds and not $30 million in currency. Both are promises to pay, but one promise fattens the usurers and the other helps the people. " 
Thomas Edison, The New York Times, December 6, 1921
"You see, a legitimate government can both spend and lend money into circulation, while banks can only lend significant amounts of their promissory bank notes, for they can neither give away nor spend but a tiny fraction of the money the people need. Thus, when your bankers here in England place money in circulation, there is always a debt principal to be returned and usury to be paid. The result is that you have always too little credit in circulation to give the workers full employment. You do not have too many workers, you have too little money in circulation, and that which circulates, all bears the endless burden of unpayable debt and usury." 
 Benjamin Franklin, as quoted from his autobiography 

"I know of no safe depository of the ultimate powers of society but the people themselves, and if we think them not enlightened enough to exercise control with a wholesome discretion, the remedy is not to take it from them, but to inform their  discretion." 
Thomas Jefferson
"The one who cannot see that on Earth a big endeavor is taking place, an important plan, on which realization we are allowed to collaborate as faithful servants, certainly has to be blind." 
- Winston Churchill 

"Truth is so precious that it must be accompanied by a bodyguard of lies." 
- Winston Churchill  

"In politics nothing is accidental. If something happens, be assured it was planned this way." 
- Franklin D. Roosevelt 

"For some time I have been disturbed by the way the CIA has been diverted from its original assignment. It has become an operational and at times a policy making arm of the government." 
- President Harry Truman 
"The high office of President has been used to foment a plot to destroy the American's freedom, and before I leave office I must inform the citizen of his plight." 
- John F. Kennedy, speaking at Columbia University, 10 days before his assassination.

"There exists a shadowy Government with its own Air Force, its own Navy, its own fundraising mechanism, and the ability to pursue its own ideas of national interest, free from all checks and balances, and free from the law itself." 
- Senator Daniel K. Inouye 

"The governments of the present day have to deal not merely with other governments, with emperors, kings and ministers, but also  with the secret societies which have everywhere their unscrupulous agents, and  can at the last moment upset all the governments' plans." 
- Benjamin Disraeli, Prime Minister of Britain, 1876 

"It is useless to deny, because it is impossible to conceal, that a great part of Europe - the whole  of Italy and France and a great portion of Germany, to say nothing of other  countries - is covered with a network of these secret societies, just as the  superficies of the earth is now being covered with railroads." 
- Benjamin Disraeli, Prime Minister of Britain, 1876 

"Fifty men have run America, and that's a high figure." 
- Joseph Kennedy, father of John F. Kennedy, in the July 26, l936 issue of The New York Times 

"Today the path of total dictatorship in the United States can be laid by strictly legal means, unseen, and unheard by the Congress, the President, or the people. Outwardly we have a Constitutional government. We have operating within our government and political system, another body representing another form of government - a bureaucratic elite." 
- Senator William Jenner, 1954 

"The powers of financial capitalism had another far-reaching aim, nothing less than to create a world system of financial control in private hands able to dominate the political system of each country and the economy of the world as a whole. This system was to be controlled in a feudalist fashion by the central banks of the world acting in concert, by secret agreements, arrived at in frequent private meetings and conferences. The apex of the system was the Bank for International Settlements in Basel, Switzerland, a private bank owned and controlled by the world's central banks which were themselves private corporations. The growth of financial capitalism made possible a centralization of world economic control and use of this power for the direct benefit of financiers and the indirect injury of all other economic groups."  
- Carroll Quigley, Professor of History at Georgetown University (deceased) in his book "Tragedy and Hope: A History of The World in Our Time", 1966, highly esteemed by his former student, William Jefferson Blythe Clinton  

"There does exist and has existed for a generation, an international Anglophile network which operates, to some extent, in the way the radical Right believes the Communists act. In fact, this network, which we may identify as the Round Table groups, has no aversion to cooperating with the Communists, or any other groups, and frequently does so. I know of the operations of this network because I have studied it for 20 years and was permitted for two years, in the early 1960s, to examine its papers and secret record." 
- Carroll Quigley, Professor of History at Georgetown University  (deceased) in his book "Tragedy and Hope: A History of the World in Our Time", 1966 

"In a small Swiss city [Basel] sits an international organization  so obscure and secretive [that few people know about it]...Control of the  institution, the Bank for International Settlements, lies with some of the  world's most powerful and least visible men; the heads of 32 central banks,  officials able to shift billions of dollars and alter the course of economies  at the stroke of a pen." 
- Keith Bradsher of the New York Times, August 5,1995 


"The Federal Reserve Bank of New York is eager to enter into close relationship with the Bank for International Settlements...The conclusion is impossible to escape that the State and Treasury Departments are  willing to pool the banking systems of Europe and America, setting up a world  financial power independent of and above the Government of the United States."  
- Congressman Louis T. McFadden, Chairman of the House Committee on Banking and Currency, quoted from the New York Times, June 1930 

"Ever since the Civil War, Congress has allowed the bankers to control financial legislation. The membership of the Finance Committee in the Senate [now the Banking and Currency Committee] and the Committee on Banking and Currency in the House have been made up chiefly of bankers, their agents, and their  attorneys...In this way the committees have been able to control legislation  in the interests of the few." 
- Congressman Charles A. Lindberg, Sr.  

"The Council on Foreign Relations is "The Establishment". Not only does it have influence and power in key decision-making positions at the highest levels of government to apply pressure from above, but it also announces and uses individuals and groups to bring pressure from below, to  justify the high level decisions for converting the U.S. from a sovereign  Constitutional Republic into a servile member state of a one-world  dictatorship." 
- Former Congressman John Rarick, 1971 

"The Council on Foreign Relations (CFR) is the American Branch of a society which originated in England [The Royal Institute of International Affairs], and believes national boundaries should be obliterated and one-world rule  established." 
- Carroll Quigley, Professor of History at Georgetown University (deceased) 

"The Trilateral Commission is intended to be the vehicle for multinational consolidation of the commercial and banking  interests by seizing control of the political government of the United States.  The Trilateral Commission represents a skillful, coordinated effort to seize control and consolidate the four centers of power - political, monetary, intellectual, and ecclesiastical. All this is to be done in the interest of creating a more peaceful, more productive world community. What the Trilateralists truly intend is the creation of a worldwide economic power superior to the political governments of the nation-states involved. They believe the abundant materialism they propose to create will overwhelm existing differences. As managers and creators of the system they will rule the future." 
- Senator Barry Goldwater, Republican candidate for President, in his book "With No Apologies", 1964 

"The drive of the Rockefellers and their allies is to create a one-world government combining super-capitalism and communism under the same tent, all under their control...Do I mean conspiracy? Yes, I do. I am convinced there is such a plot, international in scope, generations old in planning, and incredibly evil in intent." 
- Congressman Larry P. McDonald, 1976, killed in the Korean Airlines 747 (flight KAL007) that was shot down by the Soviets 

"The interests behind the Bush Administration, such as the Council on Foreign Relations, The Trilateral Commission - founded by Brzezinski for David Rockefeller - and the Bilderberger Group, have prepared for and are now moving to implement open world dictatorship within the next five years. They are not fighting against terrorists. They are fighting against citizens." 
- Dr. Johannes B. Koeppl, Ph.D., 2001, former German defense ministry official and advisor to former NATO Secretary General Manfred Werner 

"The technotronic era involves the gradual appearance of a more controlled society.  Such a society would be dominated by an elite, unrestrained by traditional values. Soon it will be possible to assert almost continuous surveillance over every citizen and maintain up-to-date complete files containing even the most personal information about the citizen. These files will be subject to instantaneous retrieval by the authorities." 
Zbigniew Brzezinski  

"In March, 1915, the J.P. Morgan interests, the steel, ship-building, and powder interest, and their subsidiary organizations, got together 12 men high up in the newspaper world and employed them to select the most influential newspapers in the United States and sufficient number of them to control generally the policy of the daily press...They found it was only necessary to purchase the control of 25 of the greatest papers. An agreement was reached; the policy of the papers was bought, to be paid for by the month; an editor was furnished for each paper to properly supervise and edit information regarding the questions of preparedness, militarism, financial policies, and other things of national and international nature considered vital to the interests of the purchasers." 
- Congressman Oscar Callaway,1917 

"There is no such thing, at this date of the world's history, in America, as an independent press. You know it and I know it. There is not one of you who dares to write your honest opinions, and if you did, you know beforehand that it will never appear in print. I am paid weekly for keeping my honest opinions out of the paper I am connected with. Others of you are paid similar salaries for similar things, and any of you who would be so foolish as to write honest opinions would be out on the streets looking for another job.  If I allowed my honest opinions to appear in one issue of my paper, before twenty-four hours my occupation would be gone. The business of the journalist is to destroy the truth; to lie outright; to pervert; to vilify; to fawn at the feet of Mammon, and to sell his country and his race for his daily bread.  You know it and I know it and what folly is this toasting an independent press? We are the tools and vassels for rich men behind the scenes. We are the jumping jacks, they pull the strings and we dance. Our talents, our possibilities and our lives are the property of other men. We are intellectual prostitutes." 
- John Swinton, Former Chief of Staff of the New York Times, called by his peers "The Dean of his profession", was asked in 1953 to give a toast before the New York Press Club 

"By a continuing process of inflation, governments can confiscate, secretly and unobserved, an important part of the wealth of their citizens. There is no subtler, more sure way of overturning the existing basis of society than to debauch the currency. The process engages all the hidden forces of economic law on the side of destruction, and does it in a manner in which not one man in a million is able to diagnose." 
- John Maynard Keynes 

"The study of money, above all other fields in economics, is one in which complexity is used to disguise truth or to evade truth, not to reveal it. The process by which banks create money is so simple that the mind is repelled." 
- John Kenneth Galbraith in his book "Money: Whence It Came, Where It Went", 1975 

"A nation of well-informed men who have been taught to know and prize the rights which God has given them cannot be enslaved. It is in the region of ignorance that tyranny begins." 
- Benjamin Franklin 

"In the colonies, we issue our own paper money. It is called 'Colonial Scrip'. We issue it in proper proportion to make the goods pass easily from the producers to the consumers.  In this manner, creating ourselves our own paper money, we control it's purchasing power and we have no interest to pay to anyone." 
- Benjamin Franklin, speaking at the London Parliament 

"The colonies would gladly have borne the little tax on tea and other matters, had it not been that  England took away from the colonies their money, which created great  unemployment and dissatisfaction. Within a year, the poor houses were filled.  The hungry and homeless walked the streets everywhere. The inability of the colonists to get power to issue their own money permanently out of the hands of George III and the International Bankers was probably the Prime reason for the Revolutionary War." 
- Benjamin Franklin, as quoted from his autobiography 
 The Federal Reserve publication, How Banks Create Money asserts: "Banks actually create money when they lend it. Here's how it works: Most of a bank's loans are made to its own customers and are deposited in their checking accounts. Because the loan becomes a new deposit, just like a pay-check does, the bank once again holds a small percentage of that new amount in reserve and again lends the remainder to someone else, repeating the money-creation process many times."

"I know of no safe depository of the ultimate powers of society but the people themselves, and if we think them not enlightened enough to exercise control with a wholesome discretion, the remedy is not to take it from them, but to inform their discretion." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"The high office of President has been used to foment a plot to destroy the American's freedom, and before I leave office I must inform the citizen of his plight." 
- John F. Kennedy, speaking at Columbia University, 10 days before his assassination 

"Mr.  Greenspan needs to make his decision independent of what I think. I learned a  pretty good lesson during the transition, and that is I commentd out loud  about one of the actions he took. That's the last time I'm going to comment about the actions Mr. Greenspan takes. He's an independent voice, and needs to be an independent voice." 
- [Notional] President George W. Bush, speaking in regards to the Federal Reserve Board Chairman, 2001 

"Those who swallow down usury cannot arise except as one whom Satan has prostrated by his  touch does rise. That is because they say, trading is only like usury; and Allah has allowed trading and forbidden usury. To whomsoever then the admonition has come from his Lord, then he desists, he shall have what is  already passed, and his affairs is in the hands of Allah; and whoever returns  to it - these are the inmates of the fire; they shall abide in it..." 
-  From the Qur'an, Surah Al-Baqarah 

"If thou lend money to any of my  people that is poor by thee, thou shalt not be to him an usurer, neither shalt  thou lay upon him usury. - Exodus 22:25. Take no usury of him, or increase...thou shalt not give him thy money upon usury. - Leviticus 25:36-37.  Unto thy brother thou shalt not lend upon usury: That the Lord thy God bless thee. - Deuteronomy 23:20" 
- The Bible 

"It comes as news to most people to learn that practically all- important ethical teachers - Moses, Aristotle, Jesus, Mohammed, and Saint Thomas Aquinas, for instance - have denounced lending at interest as usury and as morally wrong." 
- Lawrence Dennis, Saturday Review of Literature 661, June 24, 1933 

"Lucre [money] is the false Quintessence [fifth alchemical element] of this illusory world [matrix?] that we live in. It can be converted into 'anything' and 'anything' can be converted into it." 
- MIB Dissident 

"The most sinister and anti-social feature about bank-deposit money is that it has no existence. The banks owe the public for a total amount of money which does not exist. In buying and selling, implemented by cheque transactions, there is a mere change in the party to whom the money is owed by the banks. As the one depositor's account is debited, the other is credited and the banks can go on owing for it all the time. The whole profit of the issuance of money has provided the capital of the great banking business as it exists today.  Starting with nothing whatever of their own, they have got the whole world into their debt irredeemably, by a trick. This money comes into existence every time the banks 'lend' and disappears every time the debt is repaid to them. So that if industry tries to repay, the money of the nation disappears.  This is what makes prosperity so 'dangerous' as it destroys money just when it is most needed and precipitates a slump. There is nothing left now for us but to get ever deeper and deeper into debt to the banking system in order to provide the increasing amounts of money the nation requires for its expansion and growth. An honest money system is the only alternative." 
- Frederick Soddy, Nobel Prize Winner, 1921 

"If our nation can issue a dollar bond, it can issue a dollar bill. The element that makes the bond good, makes the bill good, also. The difference between the bond and the bill is the bond lets money brokers collect twice the amount of the bond and an additional 20%, whereas the currency pays nobody but those who contribute directly in some useful way. It is absurd to say that our country can issue $30 million in bonds and not $30 million in currency. Both are promises to pay, but one promise fattens the usurers and the other helps the people. " 
Thomas Edison, The New York Times, December 6, 1921 

"Economic warfare spans political warfare and military warfare and supersedes both, which are merely tools in the hands of those who are the masters of economic systems. The public is systematically misled, almost hypnotically, to believe that no such hidden masters of economic systems actually exist, or could even possibly exist, and that all of the economic strife in the world today is strictly the result of unplanned human incompetence when, in fact, very deliberate economic warfare is being carried out. Populations struggle to find purely political or military solutions to their economic problems, or they are manipulated and duped into giving yet more economic control over to their masters, in the name of their own prosperity, because they do not fully understand the real principles of economics and banking. The myth of their non-existence is what protects the hierarchies of the international money cults of the world and allows them to continue their constant rivalries against one another, and to maintain their existence at the dire cost of their subject populations." 
[Anonymous] 

"I spent 33 years in the Marines. Most of my time being a high-class muscle man for big business, for Wall Street and the bankers. In short, I was a racketeer for capitalism. I helped purify Nicaragua for the international banking house of Brown Brothers in 1909-1912. I helped make Mexico, especially Tampico, safe for American oil interests in 1914. I brought light to the Dominican Republic for American sugar interests in 1916. I helped make Haiti and Cuba a decent place for the National City Bank boys to collect revenue in. I helped in the rape of half-a-dozen Central American republics for the benefit of Wall Street...In China I helped to see to it that Standard Oil went its way unmolested." 
- Major General Smedley D. Butler, U.S.  Marine Corps. General Butler was twice awarded the Medal of Honor (1914,1917). General Douglas MacArthur described Butler as "one of the really great generals in American history." 

"We have about 50% of the world's  wealth, but only 6.3% of its population...Our real task in the coming period  is to devise a pattern of relationships which will permit us to maintain this  position of disparity...To do so, we will have to dispense with all  sentimentality and day-dreaming; and our attention will have to be  concentrated everywhere on our immediate national objectives...We should cease  to talk about vague and unreal objectives such as human rights, the raising of  living standards, and democratization. The day is not far off when we are going to have to deal in straight power concepts. The less we are then hampered by idealistic slogans, the better." 
- George Kennan, Director of State Department Policy Planning, Truman Administration, 1948 

"For globalization to work, America can't be afraid to act like the almighty superpower that it is. The hidden hand of the market will never work without a hidden fist. McDonald's cannot flourish without McDonald-Douglas, the designer of the F-15, and the hidden fist that keeps the world safe for Silicon Valley's technology is called the United States Army, Air Force, Navy and Marine Corps." - Thomas Friedman, New York Times, March 28, 1999  

"Fascism should rightly be called corporatism as it is a merge of  state and corporate power." Benito Mussolini 

"The liberty of a democracy is not safe if the people tolerate the growth of private power to a point where it becomes stronger than the democratic state itself. That in its essence is fascism: ownership of government by an individual, by a group or any controlling private power." - Franklin D. Roosevelt 

"A popular government, without popular information, or the means of acquiring it, is but a Prologue to a Farce or a Tragedy; or, perhaps both. Knowledge will forever govern ignorance. And a people who mean to be their own Governors, must arm themselves with the power that knowledge gives." 
- James Madison  

"Information is the currency of democracy." 
- Thomas Jefferson  

"I may be alone with my thoughts, on my island located on my inland sea. Previously, I would be helpless to influence my national government. With the internet, although physically isolated, I can associate with millions across my country and across the globe. No longer am I one person, and no government can afford to ignore me. I have become a power bloc, in both theory and in fact. Even if I ignore today the ability I now have to associate with others, no government can afford to ignore the possibility that someday I may, for some reason, choose to exercise this ability to associate. The individual, isolated or not, has become important." 
- Andrew Grosso, Attorney, Chairman of the ACM Committee on Law and Computer Technology 

"This country, with its institutions, belongs to the people who inhabit it. Whenever they shall grow weary of the existing government, they can exercise their constitutional right of amending it, or their revolutionary right to dismember or overthrow it." 
- Abraham Lincoln, First Inaugural Address, March 4,  1861 

"When in the course of human events, it becomes necessary for one  people to dissolve the political bonds which have connected them with another,  and...whenever any Form of Government becomes destructive of these ends [of  Life, Liberty and the Pursuit of Happiness], it is the Right of the People to  alter or to abolish it, and to institute new Government, laying its foundation  on such principles and organizing its powers in such form, as to them shall  seem most likely to effect [provide for] their Safety and Happiness..." 
-  Declaration of Independence of the American Colonies, 1776 

"A  Government that makes peaceful revolution impossible, makes armed revolution  inevitable." 
- John F. Kennedy 

"I tremble for my country when I reflect that God is just." 
- Thomas Jefferson 
                                                                  
"If you're not ready to die for it, put the word "freedom" out of your vocabulary." 
- Malcolm X  

"It is when we all play safe that we create a world of utmost insecurity." 
- Dag Hammarskjold 

"Culture is Anarchistic if it is alive at all." 
- Siva Vaidhyanathan 

"When the government fears the people, you have liberty; when the people fear the government, you have tyranny." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"...news organizations, and all Americans, in times like these have to watch what they say and watch what they do." 
- Ari Fleischer, White House Press Secretary, September 26, 2001  

"It is not the function of the government to keep the citizen from falling into error; it is the function of the citizen to keep the government from falling into error." 
- Justice Robert H. Jackson, U.S. Supreme Court Justice 

"Liberty has never come from government! Liberty has come from the subjects of government. The history of liberty is the history of resistance!" 
- Woodrow Wilson, 1912 

"They that can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety [and they will very quickly lose both]." 
- Benjamin Franklin  

"Trade liberty for safety or money and you'll end up with neither.  Liberty, like a grain of salt, easily dissolves. The power of questioning - not simply believing - has no friends. Yet liberty depends on it." 
-  Thomas Jefferson 

"In the beginning of a change, the Patriot is a scarce man, brave, hated and scorned. When his cause succeeds, however, the timid join him, for then it costs nothing to be a patriot." 
- Mark Twain  

"It is the duty of the Patriot to protect his country from its government." 
- Thomas Paine 
"Fascism should rightly be called corporatism as it is a merge of state and corporate power." 
- Benito Mussolini

"Let us disappoint the men who would raise themselves upon the ruin of our country." 
- John Adams 

"The perverse deceptiveness characteristic of the individuals who control the  Federal Reserve Bank is readily apparent to those who know the necessary  historical truths. The fact that they adorn their notes with the symbols of the Freemasons and pictures of our national heroes (to help carry on the charade that the Fed is a government institution), who were actually diametrically [totally] opposed to the Fed's existence and its type of 'money', is a mockery that is outright diabolical, and must be the insider's 'joke' of all time. Unfortunately, the consequences of this colossal con to the American people, and the entire world, are all too deadly serious. The Federal Reserve Bank is not federal, is not a reserve, and is not even a real bank." 
- [Anonymous] 

"The eyes of our citizens are not sufficiently open to the true cause of our distress. They ascribe them to everything but their true cause, the banking system; a system which if it could do good in any form is yet so certain of leading to abuse as to be utterly incompatible with the public safety and prosperity. The Central Bank is an institution of the most deadly hostility existing against the principles and form of our Constitution." 
- Thomas Jefferson 

"Once a nation parts with the control of its currency and credit, it matters not who makes the nation's laws. Usury, once in control, will wreck any nation. Until the control of the issue of currency and credit is restored to government and recognized as its most sacred responsibility, all talk of the sovereignty of parliament and of democracy is idle and futile." 
- William Mackenzie King, Prime Minister of Canada, 1935 

"All the ingredients for ending poverty of a person always comes neatly packaged with the person himself. A human being is born in this world fully equipped not only to take care of himself (which all other life-forms can do too), but also to contribute in enlarging the well-being of the world as a whole. Poverty is not created by the poor people. So, we shouldn't give them an accusing look. They are the victims. Poverty has been created by the economic and social system that we have designed for the world. It is the institutions that we have built, and feel so proud of, which created poverty. It is the concepts we developed to understand the reality around us, made us see things wrongly! It is the failure at the top - rather than lack of capability at the bottom - which is the root cause of poverty. Concepts, institutions, and analytical frame conditions which created poverty, cannot end poverty. If we can intelligently re-work the frame conditions, poverty will be gone, never to come back again...Try to imagine how the economists would have built their theory if they had started out with an axiom that all men and women are created equal, that each of them is endowed with unlimited creativity, and each of them is a potential entrepreneur. In some important ways our designing of the theoretical framework of economics or the misrepresentation of it is responsible for perpetuating poverty." 
- Professor Muhammad Yunus, Creator of Grameen Bank in Commonwealth Lecture, 2003 

"The issue which has swept down the centuries and which will have to be fought sooner or later is The People vs. The Banks." 
- Lord Acton, Lord Chief Justice of England,1875 

"Money is a new form of slavery, and distinguishable from the old simply by the fact that it is impersonal - that there is no human relation between master and slave." - Leo Tolstoy 

"The greatest enemy of mankind is his ignorance of the inherent money power in all of us. When the realization of this comes to man, he will like Samson, push down the walls of his prison." 
- E.C. Riegel 

"Nothing is more dangerous to the power of the elite than the public discovery and understanding of the private control of the money supply." 
- Anthony Sutton, "The Federal Reserve Conspiracy" 

"When plunder becomes a way of life for a group of men living together in society, they create for themselves in the course of  time, a legal system that authorizes it and a moral code that glorifies it."  
- Frederic Bastiat, in his book "Economic Sophisms" 

 Encyclical of Pope Benedict XIV . Hardly had the new controversy (namely, whether certain contracts should be held valid) come to our attention, when several opinions began spreading in Italy that hardly seemed to agree with sound doctrine; We decided that We must remedy this.  If We did not do so immediately, such an evil might acquire new force by delay and silence. If we neglected our duty, it might even spread further, shaking those cities of Italy so far not affected.  Therefore, we decided to consult with a number of the Cardinals of the Holy Roman Church, who are renowned for their knowledge and competence in theology and canon law. We also called upon many from the regular clergy who were outstanding in both the faculty of theology and that of canon law. We hose some monks, some mendicants, and finally some from the regular clergy. As presiding officer, we appointed one with degrees in both canon and civil law, who had lengthy court experience. We chose the past July 4 for the meeting at which We explained the nature of the whole business. We learned that all had known and considered it already. 2. We then ordered them to consider carefully all aspects of the matter, meanwhile searching for a solution; after this consideration, they were to write out their conclusions. We did not ask them to pass judgment on the contract which gave rise to the controversy since the many documents they would need were not available. Rather We asked that they establish a fixed teaching on usury, since the opinions recently spread abroad seemed to contradict the Church's doctrine. All complied with these orders. They gave their opinions publicly in two convocations, the first of which was held in our presence last July 18, the other last August 1; then they submitted their opinions in writing to the secretary of the convocation. 3. Indeed they proved to be of one mind in their opinions. 
I. The nature of the sin called usury has its proper place and origin in a loan contract. This financial contract between consenting parties demands, by its very nature, that one return to another only as much as he has received. The sin rests on the fact that sometimes the creditor desires more than he has given.  Therefore, he contends some gain is owed him beyond that which he loaned, but any gain which exceeds the amount he gave is illicit and usurious.    II. One cannot condone the sin of usury by arguing that the gain is not great or excessive, but rather moderate or small; neither can it be condoned by arguing that the borrower is rich; nor even by arguing that the money borrowed is not left idle, but is spent usefully, either to increase one's fortune, to purchase new estates, or to engage in business transactions. The law governing loans consists necessarily in the equality of what is given and returned; once the equality has been established, whoever demands more than that violates the terms of the loan. Therefore, if one receives interest, he must make restitution according to the commutative bond of justice; its function in human contracts is to assure equality for each one. This law is to be observed in a holy manner. If not observed exactly, reparation must be made.  III. By these remarks, however, we do not deny that at times together with the loan contract certain other titles-which are not at all intrinsic to the contract-may run parallel with it. From these other titles, entirely just and legitimate reasons arise to demand something over and above the amount due on the contract. Nor is it denied that it is very often possible for someone, by means of contracts differing entirely from loans, to spend and invest money legitimately either to provide oneself with an annual income or to engage in legitimate trade and business. From these types of contracts honest gain may be made. IV. There are many different contracts of this kind. In these contracts, if equality is not maintained, whatever is received over and above what is fair is a real injustice. Even though it may not fall under the precise rubric of usury (since all reciprocity, both open and hidden, is absent), restitution is obligated. Thus, if everything is done correctly and weighed in the scales of justice, these same legitimate contracts suffice to provide a standard and a principle or engaging in commerce and fruitful business for the common good.  Christian minds should not think that gainful commerce can flourish by usuries or other similar injustices. On the contrary, we learn from divine Revelation that justice raises up nations; sin, however, makes nations miserable. V. But you must diligently consider this, that some will falsely and rashly persuade themselves, and such people can be found anywhere-that together with loan contracts there are other legitimate titles or, excepting loan contracts, they might convince themselves that other just contracts exist, for which it is permissible to receive a moderate amount of interest. Should any one think like this, he will oppose not only the judgment of the Catholic Church on usury, but also common human sense and natural reason.  Everyone knows that man is obliged in many instances to help his fellows with a simple, plain loan. Christ Himself teaches this: "Do not refuse to lend to him who asks you."  In many circumstances, no other true and just contract may be possible except for a loan. Whoever therefore wishes to follow his conscience must first diligently inquire if, along with the loan, another category exists by means of which the gain he seeks may be lawfully attained. 
4. This is how the Cardinals and theologians and the men most conversant with the canons, whose advice We had asked for in this most serious business, explained their opinions. Also, we devoted our private study to this matter before the congregations were convened, while they were in session, and again after they had been held; for We read the opinions of these outstanding men most diligently. Because of this, we approve and confirm whatever is contained in the opinions above, since the professors of Canon Law and Theology, scriptural evidence, the decrees of previous popes, and the authority of Church councils and the Fathers all seem to enjoin it. Besides, we certainly know the authors who hold the opposite opinions and also those who either support and defend those authors or at least who seem to give them consideration.  We are also aware that the theologians of regions neighboring those in which the controversy had its origin undertook the defense of the truth with wisdom and seriousness. 5. Therefore We address these encyclical letters to all Italian Archbishops, Bishops, and priests to make all of you aware of these matters. Whenever Synods are held or sermons preached or instructions on sacred doctrine given, the above opinions must be adhered to strictly. Take great care that no one in your dioceses dares to write or preach the contrary; however, if any one should refuse to obey, he should be subjected to the penalties imposed by the sacred canons on those who violate Apostolic mandates.  6. Concerning the specific contract which caused these new controversies, we decide nothing for the present; We also shall not decide now about the other contracts in which the theologians and canonists lack agreement.  Rekindle your zeal for piety and your conscientiousness so that you may execute what We have given.  7. First of all, show your people with persuasive words that the sin and vice of usury is most emphatically condemned in the Sacred Scriptures; that it assumes various forms and appearances in order that the faithful, restored to liberty and grace by the blood of Christ, may again be driven headlong into ruin. Therefore, if they desire to invest their money, let them exercise diligent care lest they be snatched by cupidity, the source of all evil; to this end, let them be guided by those who excel in doctrine and the glory of virtue.    8. In the second place, some trust in their own strength and knowledge to such an extent that they do not hesitate to give answers to those questions which demand considerable knowledge of sacred theology and of the canons. But it is essential for these people, also, to avoid extremes, which are always evil. For instance, there are some who judge these matters with such severity that they hold any profit derived from money to be illegal and usurious; in contrast to them, there are some so indulgent and so remiss that they hold any gain whatsoever to be free of usury. Let them not adhere too much to their private opinions. Before they give their answer, let them consult a number of eminent writers; then let them accept those views which they understand to be confirmed by knowledge and authority. And if a dispute should arise, when some contract is discussed, let no insults be hurled at those who hold the contrary opinion; nor let it be asserted that it must be severely censured, particularly if it does not lack the support of reason and of men of reputation. Indeed, clamorous outcries and accusations break the chain of Christian love and give offense and scandal to the people.  9. In the third place, those who desire to keep themselves free and untouched by the contamination of usury and to give their money to another in such a manner that they may receive only legitimate gain should be admonished to make a contract beforehand. In the contract they should explain the conditions and what gain they expect from their money. This will not only greatly help to avoid concern and anxiety, but will also confirm the contract in the realm of public business. This approach also closes the door on controversies-which have arisen more than once, since it clarifies whether the money, which has been loaned without apparent interest, may actually contain concealed usury.    10. In the fourth place We exhort you not to listen to those who say that today the issue of usury is present in name only, since gain is almost always obtained from money given to another. How false is this opinion and how far removed from the truth! We can easily understand this if we consider that the nature of one contract differs from the nature of another. By the same token, the things which result from these contracts will differ in accordance with the varying nature of the contracts. Truly an obvious difference exists between gain which arises from money legally, and therefore can be upheld in the courts of both civil and canon law, and gain which is illicitly obtained, and must therefore be returned according to the judgments of both courts. Thus, it is clearly invalid to suggest, on the grounds that some gain is usually received from money lent out, that the issue of usury is irrelevant in our times. 11. These are the chief things We wanted to say to you. We hope that you may command your faithful to observe what these letters prescribe; and that you may undertake effective remedies if disturbances should be stirred up among your people because of this new controversy over usury or if the simplicity and purity of doctrine should become corrupted in Italy.  Finally, to you and to the flock committed to your care, we impart the Apostolic Benediction.    .... 
    
  Larry Parks, Executive Director, FAME "With the monetary system we have now, the careful saving of a lifetime can be wiped out in an eyeblink."
                                     

  Voltaire (1694-1778) “Paper money eventually returns to its intrinsic value ---- zero.”  
  Daniel Webster, 
speech in the Senate, 1833 “We are in danger of being overwhelmed with irredeemable paper, mere paper, representing not gold nor silver; no sir, representing nothing but broken promises, bad faith, bankrupt corporations, cheated creditors and a ruined people.”  
  Thomas Jefferson to 
John Taylor, 1816 “I sincerely believe ... that banking establishments are more dangerous than standing armies, and that the principle of spending money to be paid by posterity under the name of funding is but swindling futurity on a large scale.”  
  Daniel Webster "Of all the contrivances for cheating the laboring classes of mankind, none has been more effective than that which deludes them with paper money."  
  St. Louis Federal Reserve Bank, 
Review, Nov. 1975, p.22 "The decrease in purchasing power incurred by holders of money due to inflation imparts gains to the issuers of money--."  
  Federal Reserve Bank, New York  
The Story of Banks, p.5.  "Because of 'fractional' reserve system, banks, as a whole, can expand our money supply several times, by making loans and investments."  
  Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia, 
Gold, p. 10 "Without the confidence factor, many believe a paper money system is liable to collapse eventually."  
  Federal reserve Bank of New York,  
I Bet You Thought, p.19 "Commercial banks create checkbook money whenever they grant a loan, simply by adding new deposit dollars in accounts on their books in exchange for a borrower's IOU."  
  Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago,  
Modern Money Mechanics, p.3 "The actual process of money creation takes place in commercial banks. As noted earlier, demand liabilities of commercial banks are money."  
  U.S. Supreme Court, 
Craig v. Missouri, 
4 Peters 410.  "Emitting bills of credit, or the creation of money by private corporations, is what is expressly forbidden by Article 1, Section 10 of the U.S. Constitution."  
  James A. Garfield "Whoever controls the volume of money in any country is absolute master of all industry and commerce."  
  Frederic Bastiat, 
The Law "When plunder becomes a way of life for a group of men living together in society, they create for themselves in the course of time a legal system that authorizes it and a moral code that glorifies it."  
  Irving Fisher, 
100% Money "Thus, our national circulating medium is now at the mercy of loan transactions of banks, which lend, not money, but promises to supply money they do not possess."  
  John Maynard Keynes,  
The Economic Consequences of the Peace,  
1920, page 240 "If, however, a government refrains from regulations and allows matters to take their course,  essential commodities soon attain a level of price out of the reach of all but the rich, the worthlessness of the money becomes apparent, and the fraud upon the public can be concealed no longer."  
  John Maynard Keynes,  
The Economic Consequences of the Peace, 
1920, page 235ff "Lenin is said to have declared that the best way to destroy the Capitalistic System was to debauch the currency. . .  Lenin was certainly right. There is no subtler, no surer means of overturning the existing basis of society than to debauch the currency. The process engages all the hidden forces of economic law on the side of destruction, and does it in a manner which not one man in a million can diagnose."  
  Ralph M. Hawtrey, 
former Secretary of Treasury, 
England "Banks lend by creating credit. They create the means of payment out of nothing."++  
  Robert H. Hemphill, 
former credit manager, 
Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta "Money is the most important subject intellectual persons can investigate and reflect upon. It is so important that our present civilization may collapse unless it is widely understood and its defects remedied very soon."++  
  Sir Josiah Stamp, former President, 
Bank of England "Bankers own the earth. Take it away from them, but leave them the power to create money and control credit, and with a flick of a pen they will create enough to buy it back."++  
  Rt. Hon. Reginald McKenna, former 
Chancellor of Exchequer, England  "Those who create and issue money and credit direct the policies of government and hold in the hollow of their hands the destiny of the people."++  
  John Adams, letter to 
Thomas Jefferson  "All the perplexities, confusion and distresses in America arise not from defects in the constitution or confederation, nor from want of honor or virtue, as much from downright ignorance of the nature of coin, credit, and circulation."  
  Wm. Jennings Bryan "Money power denounces, as public enemies, all who question its methods or throw light upon its crimes."  
  George Washington, in letter to J. Bowen, Rhode Island, 
Jan. 9, 1787 "Paper money has had the effect in your state that it will ever have, to ruin commerce, oppress the honest, and open the door to every species of fraud and injustice."  
  George Bancroft,  
A Plea for the Constitution (1886) "Madison, agreeing with the journal of the convention, records that the grant of power to emit bills of credit was refused by a majority of more than four to one. The evidence is perfect; no power to emit paper money was granted to the legislature of the United States."  
  Article One, Section Ten,  

  John C. Calhoun, 
Speech 5/27/1836 "A power has risen up in the government greater than the people themselves, consisting of many and various powerful interest, combined in one mass; and held together by the cohesive power of the vast surplus in banks."    
Andrew Jackson: To delegation of 
bankers discussing the 
Bank Renewal Bill, 1832.  "You are a den of vipers and thieves. I intend to rout you out, and by the eternal God, I will rout you out."  

  Treasury Secretary Woodin, 
3/7/33 "Where would we be if we had I.O.U.'s scrip and certificates floating all around the country?" Instead he decided to "issue currency against the sound assets of the banks. [As opposed to issuing currency against gold.] The Federal Reserve Act lets us print all we'll need. And it won't frighten the people. It won't look like stage money. It'll be money that looks like real money." [Emphasis added.] (Source: 'Closed for the Holiday: The Bank Holiday of 1933', p20 - Federal Reserve Bank of Boston)  
  John Kenneth Galbraith “The study of money, above all other fields in economics, is one in which complexity is used to disguise truth or to evade truth, not to reveal it.” Money: Whence it came, where it went - 1975, p15  
  
John Kenneth Galbraith “The process by which banks create money is so simple that the mind is repelled.”  
Money: Whence it came, where it went - 1975, p29  
 
 Senator Carter Glass, 
Author of the Banking Act of 1933 "Is there any reason why the American people should be taxed to guarantee the debts of banks, any more than they should be taxed to guarantee the debts of other institutions, including merchants, the industries, and the mills of the country?"  
 
   Chief Justice Salmon Chase, formerly Secretary of Treasury in President Lincoln’s administration, in dissent of Knox vs. Lee (The Legal Tender Cases, 1871)
 “The legal tender quality [of money] is only valuable for the purposes of dishonesty.”  

  Dr. Alan Greenspan, Chairman of the Federal Reserve Board of Governors, 11/20/2003 "As long as we issue fiat currency, I see no alternative to a legal tender law."  

  John Adams "All the perplexities, confusion and distress in America arise, not from defects in their Constitution or Confederation, not from want of honor or virtue, so much as from the downright ignorance of the nature of coin, credit and circulation."  
    Friedrich A. Hayek (1899-1992) Austrian Economist, Author and 1974 Nobel Prize-Winner for Economics
 “With the exception only of the period of the gold standard, practically all governments of history have used their exclusive power to issue money to defraud and plunder the people.”   
  Dr. Edwin Vieira, FAME Foundation Scholar "You can fool some of the people all of the time, and all of the people some of the time, and that's good enough."
"A lie repeated a thousand times becomes the 'truth'." 
- [Unknown] 

"The perfect slave is the slave who thinks that he is free." 
- [Unknown]  

"The truth is always revolutionary." 
- Antonio Gramsci  

"The Empire never ended." 
- Philip K. Dick 
  "Military men are just dumb, stupid animals to be used as pawns for foreign policy" Henry Kissinger.


